


Mark B. Templeton - Wikipedia





















 






Mark B. Templeton

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






The neutrality of this article is disputed. Relevant discussion may be found on the talk page. Please do not remove this message until conditions to do so are met. (April 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Mark B. Templeton was President and CEO of Citrix Systems, Inc from 2001 to 2015.[1] He attended North Carolina State University, where he joined Lambda Chi Alpha Fraternity. He has an MBA from Darden Graduate School of Business Administration.
Templeton joined Citrix in 1995 as vice president of marketing, prior to the company’s initial public offering. He was appointed president in 1998 and chief executive officer in 2001. Under his leadership, Citrix transformed from a $15 million organization with one product, one customer segment and one go-to-market path, to a global powerhouse with annual revenues of $3.28 billion in 2015. Today, Citrix solutions and products enable mobile workstyles for millions of people every day. Citrix services more than 260,000 organizations with over 10,000 business partners in 100 countries.
Templeton holds a bachelor's degree in product design from North Carolina State University and an MBA from the University of Virginia, Darden School of Business. He is a passionate participant in many community and charitable organizations and serves on the board of directors of Equifax.
A popular and provocative speaker, Templeton has shared his perspective and technology vision with audiences at events such as CIO 100 and Interop, as well as the Citrix Synergy user and Citrix Summit partner conferences. He has received numerous leadership awards, such as the AeA Abacus Award for Outstanding High-Tech Executive, “Businessperson of the Year” (EVIE Award) and the Excalibur Award. He is also included on Glassdoor’s 2013 list of “50 Highest Rated CEOs.”
In his visit to Citrix SaaS division offices in February 2014, Templeton declared his highest aspiration was to be a moral corporate leader, and he received a standing ovation. Two weeks later the branch cut its workforce by 10%, something Templeton neglected to announce as the employees applauded his virtue.[2]
Templeton contributed the maximum allowed by law to Jeb Bush's 2016 Presidential Campaign. In the past he has contributed to the Republican National Committee, John McCain, Hillary Clinton, Tim Mahoney, and Ron Klein.[3][4][5][6][7][8] Templeton owns Tesla Roadster Founder's 016, Tesla Model S Founder's 020 and Tesla Model X Founder's 003. [9][10]
References[edit]



^ "Citrix Appoints Board Member Robert Calderoni as Interim President and CEO". 
^ Hoffrman, Lyz. "Citrix laying off 65 employees". SB Independent.  March 12, 2014
^ "Search Campaign Finance Data by Individual Contributor". www.fec.gov. Retrieved 2015-10-24. 
^ "FEC FORM 3X - Transaction ID 2010M04L11AI20399" (PDF). FEC Itemized Receipts Disclosures. United States Federal Election Commission. 2010-03-25. Retrieved 2015-10-23. 
^ "FEC - Schedule A-P Itemized Receipts 201510159003081219". FEC. United States Federal Election Commission. Retrieved 2015-10-23. 
^ "FEC Disclosure Report Search Results". docquery.fec.gov. Retrieved 2015-10-24. 
^ "PAGE BY PAGE REPORT DISPLAY FOR 26020910001 (Page 340 of 3609)". docquery.fec.gov. Retrieved 2015-10-24. 
^ "Donor Lookup: Find Individual and Soft Money Contributors | OpenSecrets". www.opensecrets.org. Retrieved 2015-10-24. 
^ "TMC forum post selling Tesla Roadster Founder's 00016". 
^ "EV and More blog on Tesla Model X impressions". 



External links[edit]

Company page







v
t
e


Citrix Systems



Subsidiaries



Ardence
Citrix Online
Net6
RightSignature
ShareFile
Zenprise





Products



Apache CloudStack
Citrix WinFrame
Cloud.com
GoToMeeting
GoToAssist
GoToMyPC
Podio
Xen
XenClient





People



Ed Iacobucci
Mark B. Templeton










This article about a chief executive from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.


v
t
e









 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Mark_B._Templeton&oldid=784032238"					
Categories: American computer businesspeopleAmerican technology chief executivesBusinesspeople in softwareLiving peopleNorth Carolina State University alumniUniversity of Virginia Darden School of Business alumniAmerican chief executive stubsHidden categories: NPOV disputes from April 2017All NPOV disputesAll stub articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 6 June 2017, at 02:36.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 
















404 - Citrix



















































































Sign Out
Sign In

 


Products

















APP VIRTUALIZATION & VDI
XenApp & XenDesktop
XenServer




ENTERPRISE MOBILITY MANAGEMENT
XenMobile




FILE SYNC & SHARING
ShareFile




NETWORKING
NetScaler ADC
NetScaler AppFirewall
NetScaler Unified Gateway
NetScaler Management & Analytics System
NetScaler SD-WAN
























Take advantage of our products as an integrated suite or in the cloud
Citrix Workspace | Citrix Cloud


























Secure your apps and data
End-to-end security solutions















BY INDUSTRY
Healthcare
Finance
Government
Education
Manufacturing



















All Products








Downloads















 
Find Downloads

Select a product...
AppDNA
Citrix App Layering
Citrix Receiver
Citrix Workspace Suite
CloudBridge
CloudPortal Services Manager
Command Center
DesktopPlayer
EdgeSight
Licensing
NetScaler ADC
NetScaler AppFirewall
NetScaler Gateway
NetScaler MAS
NetScaler SD-WAN
Provisioning Services
Receiver
ShareFile
StoreFront/Web Interface
VDI-in-a-Box
XenApp
XenApp Fundamentals
XenApp & XenDesktop
XenClient
XenDesktop
XenMobile
XenServer

or




Search
















Download Receiver
Install or upgrade from ICA client



















All Downloads   |   Free trials








Support & Services

















Get Support







Select a product...
App Layering (formerly Unidesk)
App Orchestration
AppDNA
Application Firewall
Application Streaming
ByteMobile
Citrix Cloud
Citrix Licensing
CloudPlatform (powered by Apache CloudStack)
CloudPortal Business Manager
CloudPortal Services Manager
Command Center
DesktopPlayer
EdgeSight
End of Life
Melio
NetScaler
NetScaler Gateway (Formerly Access Gateway)
NetScaler MAS
NetScaler SD-WAN
OpenCloud
OpenVoice (previously Hi-Def Corporate)
Podio
Provisioning Services
Receiver
Secure Gateway
ShareConnect
ShareFile
Single Sign-on (Password Manager)
SmartAuditor
StorageLink
StoreFront
User Profile Management
VDI-in-a-Box
Web Interface
Workflow Studio
XenApp
XenApp Plug-ins (Clients)
XenClient
XenDesktop
XenMobile
XenServer



Go






or














Search










Open a support case
Search product documentation
Read Knowledge Center articles
Explore support and maintenance programs
Request a support sales call













Consulting Services
Browse consulting offerings
Contact Citrix Consulting
Training and Certification
Browse training catalog
Become Citrix Certified



















All Support | All Consulting Services | All Training








Partners

















Find a Partner
Search for a partner in your area
Browse our Global Partners
Learn how our strategic alliances benefit you
Citrix compatible products
Browse partner products verified to work with Citrix













Become a Partner
Increase your profitability and success with Citrix
Citrix Partner Central
Market, sell and manage your Citrix business



















Sign Out
Sign In


 
 


 




























Oops, the page you're trying to view isn't here.
Please visit our Home Page, Site Map or Search our site:







































 




About Citrix


About


Future of work


What does Citrix do?


News


Investor Relations


Careers


Contact






Community


Citrix Community


Blogs








Learning


Events and Webinars


Training and Certification


Articles and Insights


Customer Stories


Glossary






My Account


Manage Licenses


Renew Maintenance


Support Case


See All in My Account


Sign in/Register


Sign Out








FOLLOW CITRIX









Subscribe to the Citrix Newsletters








Global Sites   -  Choose your language



XenApp, XenDesktop, XenMobile and XenServer are part of the Xen® family of products.
© 1999-2017 Citrix Systems, Inc. All Rights Reserved.

Privacy and Terms
Employee Login
Site Map












Austria – Deutsch
Argentina – Español
Barbados – English
Bolivia – Español
Brasil – Português
Cayman Islands – English
Česká republika – Čeština
Chile – Español
Colombia – Español
Costa Rica – Español
Danmark – Dansk





Deutschland – Deutsch
Ecuador – Español
España – Español
France – Français
Guatemala – Español
Haiti – English
India – English
Italia – Italiano
Jamaica – English
México – Español
Nederland – Nederlands
Norge – Norsk







Panamá – Español
Paraguay – Español
Perú – Español
Polska – Polski
Puerto Rico – Español
República Dominicana – Español
Schweiz – Deutsch
Suomi – Suomi
Sverige – Svenska
Trinidad and Tobago – English
Türkiye – Türkçe





United Kingdom - English
United States – English
Uruguay – Español
US/British Virgin Islands – English
Venezuela – Español
Россия – Русский
대한민국 – 한국어
中国 – 简体中文
台灣 – 繁體中文
日本 – 日本語







 

























Templeton, Mark B. - The Wall Street Transcript














































 





































Mark B. Templeton
MARK B. TEMPLETON recently became President of Citrix after serving as
the company’s Vice President of worldwide marketing for two and a-half
years. Templeton is responsible for Citrix’s global strategy, planning
and operations, with a focus on guiding the company’s international
growth, acquisitions and product-line diversification. As Vice President
of marketing, Templeton led the company’s worldwide marketing strategy
and operations including product strategy/planning, channel development,
product marketing, strategic partnering, international market
development and corporate communications. He has over 12 years
experience in senior marketing and executive management positions.
Related Interviews:Mark B. Templeton -  Citrix Systems Inc (ctxs)December 21, 1998







CartLatest NewsJames Abate of Centre Asset Management Sees Consumer Demand Driving New Stock HighsMalcolm E. Polley of Stewart Capital and How to Play the Health Care StocksTimothy Biltz, CEO of Lumos Networks Identifies the Key Component for Future 5G NetworksThe Wall Street Transcript is a completely unique resource for investors and business researchers.Over 20,000 CEO, Equity Analyst and Money Manager InterviewsSubscribe now!Sign Up For Newsletter Weekly email with New In-Depth Interviews


Email: 



Most Popular InterviewsDelivering Long-Term Results with a Risk-Managed Growth FundJames A. Abate Published July 20, 2017 in Investing StrategiesCompanies covered: AMAT JNJ COH RL COG NVDA ADBE ATVI KLAC AMZN NFLX GOOG FB GLW MU 005930 000660 WFM JWN CMG GPS EQT RICE SPLS Buy ($25)Finding Investments with Favorable Risk and Reward OpportunitiesHenry  Beukema Published July 19, 2017 in Investing StrategiesCompanies covered: ORCL MSFT NSRGY AMZN WFM LRLCY AGN LNR Buy ($25)Better Returns and Lower Risk in the Midcap SpaceMalcolm E. Polley Published July 18, 2017 in Investing StrategiesCompanies covered: PRAA HURN FII FL NKE AMZN WFM WBA RAD Buy ($25)Most Popular ReportsWireless Communications & Telecom Published July 14, 2017Buy ($175)Investing Strategies Published July 11, 2017Buy ($175)Investing Strategies Published June 30, 2017Buy ($175) 






Top Company Interviews






Register for a Free Account to gain greater access to
            The Wall Street Transcript right now




CEO INTERVIEWSInterview with the President and CEO: Lumos Networks Corp. (NASDAQ:LMOS)Interview with the Corporate VP of Business Development, Strategy and Investor Relations: DSP Group, Inc. (NASDAQ:DSPG)Interview with the CEO and Director: Tactile Systems Technology, Inc. (NASDAQ:TCMD) 

SECTOR ROUNDTABLESNatural Gas Weighs Heavy On E&P Near-Term ProspectsRoundtable Forum:optimism Despite Uncertainty In For-profit EducationRoundtable Forum:a Shift In Focus To Natural Gas From Oil 

MONEY MANAGER INTERVIEWSDelivering Long-Term Results with a Risk-Managed Growth FundFinding Investments with Favorable Risk and Reward OpportunitiesBetter Returns and Lower Risk in the Midcap Space 

ANALYST INTERVIEWSAnalyzing the Secular Drivers Within Communications Infrastructure and TelecomSatellite Companies Benefiting from Growth in Data TrafficIncreased Focus on Content as Consumers Shift to Digital Consumption 




Subscribe Today!







                Since 1963
                © The Wall Street Transcript 1997-2016
Terms and Conditions
Privacy Policy  
            





https://www.twst.com/wp-admin/admin-ajax.php

Pin It on Pinterest





































Share This





Twitter





Facebook





Google+





Gmail





LinkedIn








































×





Join now for free!
Already a member?






First Name 





Last Name 





Email address *








Create new account
 


or create an account with a social network.

Join with Facebook


Join with Twitter


Join with Google








Username or Email address: *





Password: *






LoginJoin now! | Forgot password?
 


or login using a social network


Log in with Facebook


Log in with Twitter


Log in with Google





















Mark B. Templeton - Executive Bio, Compensation History, and Contacts - Equilar Atlas










 

















Log in | Sign up








x

 






As Featured In



















Mark B. Templeton
Board Member at Equifax Inc.


View Full Profile
Are you Mark B. Templeton? Claim your profile


 


Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Mark B. Templeton's full profile. 
With Equilar Atlas, you can:



IDENTIFY corporate executives in Mark B. Templeton's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Mark B. Templeton's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Mark B. Templeton through your network of contacts.
												








Mark B. Templeton's Executive Work History


Current


Board Member, 
Equifax Inc.


Board Member, 
Keysight Technologies, Inc.


Past
To view Mark B. Templeton's complete executive work history, sign up now
Age
64

 
 


Mark B. Templeton's Biography



Mark B. Templeton is a new nominee to our board of directors. Mr. Templeton served as the president and/or chief executive officer of Citrix Systems, Inc., a global provider of virtualization, mobility management, networking and software as service solutions, from January 1998 until his retirement in October 2015. Mr. Templeton has served on the board of directors of Equifax, Inc., a global information solutions provider, since 2008 and Keysight Technologies, Inc., an electronic test and measurement company, since 2015. He served as a director of Citrix Systems, Inc. from January 1998 to October 2015. Mr. Templeton holds a B.A. degree in prod ...
(Read More)

			Mark B. Templeton is a new nominee to our board of directors. Mr. Templeton served as the president and/or chief executive officer of Citrix Systems, Inc., a global provider of virtualization, mobility management, networking and software as service solutions, from January 1998 until his retirement in October 2015. Mr. Templeton has served on the board of directors of Equifax, Inc., a global information solutions provider, since 2008 and Keysight Technologies, Inc., an electronic test and measurement company, since 2015. He served as a director of Citrix Systems, Inc. from January 1998 to October 2015. Mr. Templeton holds a B.A. degree in product design from North Carolina State University and an M.B.A. from the Darden School of Business at the University of Virginia.
We believe Mr. Templeton possesses specific attributes that qualify him to serve as a member of our board of directors, including his extensive experience in the networking industry and as chief executive officer and board member of companies in the technology industry.
		
Source: Arista Networks, Inc. on 03/24/2017
		
	

 






Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view Mark B. Templeton's full profile. 



												By accessing Equilar Atlas, you can view bios, network, salary and wealth events
												of industry-leading executives like Mark B. Templeton. More specifically, you'll be able to:
												

IDENTIFY corporate executives in Mark B. Templeton's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in Mark B. Templeton's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with Mark B. Templeton through your network of conections.
												




View Full Profile


 








Search for over 360,000 executive profiles.





/bio



													Example: Mark B. Templeton


















Mark B. Templeton's Connections (106)





Sign up now to view Mark B. Templeton's 106 connections »









Francis A. deSouza
Dir., President and Chief Executive Officer, Illumina, Inc.









Jacquelyn M. Ward
Board Member, Sysco Corporation









Ronald S. Nersesian
Dir., President and Chief Executive Officer, Keysight Technologies, Inc.









Elane B. Stock
Employee, Kimberly-Clark Corporation









Charles J. Dockendorff
Board Member, Haemonetics Corporation









John M. Greathouse
Former Executive Vice President of Sales and Business Development, FuzeBox









Nanci E. Caldwell
Board Member, Canadian Imperial Bank of Commerce









L. Phillip Humann
Lead Independent Director, Equifax Inc.









Robert D. Marcus
Former Chairman of the Board and Chief Executive Officer, Spectrum Management Holding Company, LLC









Kevin R. Compton
Former Board Member, Volterra Semiconductor Corporation








Popular Profiles






														Sign up now to view more executive profiles »
														









John J. Kita
EVP and CFO, A. O. Smith









Elon R. Musk
CEO and Chairman, Tesla









Thomas J. Lynch
Executive Chairman, TE Connectivity Ltd.









Jan Koum
Board Member, Facebook, Inc.









Robert D. Perlmutter
Senior EVP and COO, The Macerich Company












×

Claim Your Profile Coming Soon
Interested in updating your biography and work history?
We're working on making it happen.
We'll email you when this feature is available.
Please enter valid email address.

Done


Thank you for your interest.
Ok






			Browse executive profiles:
			
				 A
			
				 B
			
				 C
			
				 D
			
				 E
			
				 F
			
				 G
			
				 H
			
				 I
			
				 J
			
				 K
			
				 L
			
				 M
			
				 N
			
				 O
			
				 P
			
				 Q
			
				 R
			
				 S
			
				 T
			
				 U
			
				 V
			
				 W
			
				 X
			
				 Y
			
				 Z



Equilar Homepage
Equilar Atlas
Equilar Insight
Equilar BoardEdge
Equilar Engage
Research Services
Knowledge Network
About Us
Login

� 2017 Equilar All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy
1100 Marshall Street, Redwood City, CA 94063 | Phone (650) 241-6600 | Fax (650) 701-0993



















Mark B. Templeton




















































































   Quizzes | Lists | Trending  



Sign up / Login  



Feedback  


    

  Mark B. Templeton  Topics |  Videos |  Discussion |  Write-ups

 
















 


  


  


 


 







 








Back to Top

© Revolvy, LLC

Mobile
Terms
Privacy
Contact








Paste Image Information Here:
×


Image:


Source:



Save changes









×





Cancel





...
×















×



Done
Cancel
By proceeding I agree to the Revolvy
terms of service and
     privacy policy.











OK
Cancel










OK
Cancel







×



OK
Cancel








×



OK
Cancel







×



OK
Cancel







×



Save

Cancel






×



OK
Clear
Cancel






×



OK
Clear
Cancel














 




Mark Templeton of Citrix, on the Big Career Choice - The New York Times







































































































































NYTimes.com no longer supports Internet Explorer 9 or earlier. Please upgrade your browser.
LEARN MORE »









Sections

Home

Search
Skip to content
Skip to navigation
View mobile version




The New York Times





Business Day|Paint by Numbers or Connect the Dots







Search

Subscribe Now
Log In
0
Settings




Close search



https://nyti.ms/OeuNGX








Advertisement








Supported by



Business Day

Paint by Numbers or Connect the Dots



Corner Office 
By                     
 ADAM BRYANT
 
SEPT. 22, 2012




Continue reading the main story
Share This Page

Continue reading the main story









 This interview with 

Mark B. Templeton, president and C.E.O. of Citrix, the Internet software company, was conducted and edited by 

Adam Bryant. Q. You’ve been the chief executive of Citrix since 1999. That’s a long tenure compared to most C.E.O.’s.A. I didn’t want to be C.E.O. at first. I had no interest, and it was kind of accidental. A lot of people I meet who have the title also have the ambition that goes with it and the desire to be C.E.O. But I’ve never really had that ambition in my life. I think there’s a bit of a lesson in it. Just generally in my career — and I’ve seen it in some team sports I’ve played, like lacrosse and soccer — the guy who always says “give me the ball” is usually the one who probably shouldn’t have the ball. It’s the guy who plays his position and is just doing his job that oftentimes is the guy you should give the ball to.Q. Why didn’t you have the ambition for the top job?A. It was probably a combination of two things. Before Citrix, I had a number of start-up experiences. One of them was as C.E.O., and we ran out of money and I had to lay off about 30 people. I had a pretty deep scar from that experience, and I thought, “O.K., that’s not for me.” I decided that focusing on marketing and telling stories around products and understanding customers was really what I was best at.

Advertisement

Continue reading the main story

The other reason was that we were a public company and I didn’t really feel I was qualified to be C.E.O. Again, there’s a lesson here. You try as a manager to never put people in situations where it’s too big a stretch for them, because it often doesn’t work out too well. Usually when people end up there, it’s because the person who really wants the job has overestimated their own capabilities, or management has overimagined someone’s capabilities and puts them there mistakenly. I didn’t feel I was qualified. Continue reading the main story







Advertisement

Continue reading the main story





And there was a time, a small gap, when I lost the C.E.O job. In the June quarter of 2000, we really missed our expectations, and by then I’d been C.E.O. for six quarters and I was learning a lot, especially about working with the board. I had not kept the board informed about what was going on and some of the struggles we were having, and I was trying to carry all of it myself, which is what green leaders do. After we missed our expectations hugely, the board decided we would do a public search for a replacement, and I was demoted to president and senior executive officer. I deserved that because that’s part of the game, being held accountable. So we did a public search for a replacement and we had a candidate, but the board decided they didn’t like him. That was about six months in. Then we had a second one, but the board decided that I was actually a viable candidate again. They asked me if I’d be interested in having my title back. It took me about a microsecond to say yes.Q. So you were able to hit the reset button on the C.E.O. job, but with lessons learned.A. And what a set of lessons to learn. No. 1: Remember you’re a member of the team, and teams can take on big problems. You don’t have to carry them yourself.  In fact, as C.E.O. you have two teams, your board and management. And No. 2: Communication with the board is really critical to your success because that’s how you can get the kind of advice you need to lead a company through hard times.Q. What are your thoughts about company culture?A. You have to make sure you never confuse the hierarchy that you need for managing complexity with the respect that people deserve. Because that’s where a lot of organizations go off track, confusing respect and hierarchy, and thinking that low on hierarchy means low respect; high on the hierarchy means high respect. So hierarchy is a necessary evil of managing complexity, but it in no way has anything to do with respect that is owed an individual.If you say that to everyone over and over and over, it allows people in the company to send me an e-mail no matter what their title might be or to come up to me at any time and point out something — a great idea or a great problem or to seek advice or whatever.Q. Other thoughts on culture?A. The way we define culture over all is how companies get things done. If you have a factory, you get a lot of things done through machinery. Most companies in software get things done through people. So our machinery is people, and to put it in technology terms, people are the hardware and our values are the operating system.
Photo






Mark B. Templeton is president and C.E.O. of Citrix, the Internet software company.

Credit
            Earl Wilson/The New York Times        


So the culture starts with people with a common operating system around values and then, once you have that, you can build processes around how you actually get things done on top of that. But clarity around the hardware and the operating system to me is first and foremost, so it’s about people and our three values: respect, integrity, humility.

Advertisement

Continue reading the main story

It turns out that when you are that clear around people and values, it empowers people and creates an entrepreneurial spirit that gives people space and rope, rather than being in a command-and-control environment.Q. Can you elaborate?A. First of all, everyone feels that they’re birds of a feather because of common values.  We have clarity around where we’re going, and then they get to fill in how we’re going to get there — with the right kind of management, of course, and leadership, and the right kind of processes and metrics. But it’s very much seen as a giant start-up.
Newsletter Sign Up
Continue reading the main story

  


Please verify you're not a robot by clicking the box.
Invalid email address. Please re-enter.
You must select a newsletter to subscribe to.



Sign Up







You agree to receive occasional updates and special offers for The New York Times's products and services.





Thank you for subscribing.
An error has occurred. Please try again later.
You are already subscribed to this email.
View all New York Times newsletters.


See Sample
Manage Email Preferences
Not you?
Privacy Policy
Opt out or contact us anytime




I think people generally want to belong to something of greater purpose that’s larger than they are. They’re just waiting for it to come along. And I think a culture around values is part of that. People say, “I want to be on that team, that club, because they believe in something and I actually believe in that, so I want to belong to that.”So communicate it, make it simple and clear, and then whenever you observe a violation, no matter what it is, you shine a light on it and ask everyone to do that if they see a violation, and hold everyone accountable to it, including your manager and your colleagues. What I also point out to people is that everyone participates in this because they are all on a hiring team. So you have to understand the values because people will come through the filter with a great résumé and all the skills, but have they demonstrated the right cultural characteristics?So we’re very clear about culture, and the theory is that as long as we have a common operating system that sits on the hardware, then we can have all kinds of ways of getting things done.Q. How do you hire? What are you looking for?A. It starts with these values, and then on top of that the things that I really value start with curiosity, because curiosity is a measure of self-motivation. People who are curious will develop themselves, they’ll discover things, they’ll invent things. You look for demonstrations of curiosity, because that is where someone has done something on their own time that’s outside the band of what they would normally be doing.The second thing I look for is scars. You can call it wisdom, you can call it experience, or the things that went wrong in your life. That’s where I think knowledge turns into wisdom. A lot of people will have facts and information. I’m looking for wisdom, and wisdom ends up being a measure of scars, and things that went wrong and what you did about them and how they shaped you as a person and your beliefs. Because people usually lead around the beliefs they’ve developed.And do you know how to motivate people?  Do you know how to align people who are in different organizations and work in a matrix kind of model? Do you have a vision?  Do you have opinions? With people who have worked for me and failed, the pattern is that they’re trying to guess what I believe and they’re trying to tell me what they think I want to hear. I know what my opinions are. I want your opinions and I want them to be something that you have some belief in and a reason to believe in them, and I want to know why.Q. What kind of advice do you give business students?A. I’ve given this talk for a lot of years because this is what I’ve learned and observed.  There are two strategies for your life and career. One is paint-by-numbers and the other is connect-the-dots. I think most people remember their aunt who brought them a gift for their birthday or whatever and it was a paint-by-number set or a connect-the-dots book.

Advertisement

Continue reading the main story

So with the paint-by-number set, you know ahead of time what it’s going to look like. Then, by contrast, with a connect-the-dots puzzle, you can only guess at what it might look like by the time you finish. And what you notice about that process is the further along you get, the more clear it becomes. It might be a beach ball, or a seal in a Sea World park or something. The speed at which you connect dots gets faster as the picture starts coming into view.You probably get the parallel. This isn’t about what’s right and what’s wrong.  This is about getting it right for you. Parents often want you to paint by numbers. They want it so badly because they have a perception that it’s lower risk, and that’s the encouragement they’re going to give you. They’re going to push you down this road, and faculty members will, too, because they want you to deliver on what they taught you. It doesn’t make it wrong; it’s just that there’s a bias in the system. You have to decide for yourself. The earlier you actually get it right for yourself, the faster and the better that picture is going to look.And the more time you spend on paint by numbers when you’re a connect-the-dots person, and vice versa, the harder it’s going to be.
Continue reading the main story






We’re interested in your feedback on this page. Tell us what you think.




















Corner Office
Conversations with Adam Bryant about leadership and management.









                                Lyft’s John Zimmer on Empowering Others to Help Them Grow            
JUL 21








                                Erika Nardini on the Value of Leading ‘10 Percent’ Players            
JUL 14








                                Don Mal on the Relentless Pursuit of Making Your Numbers            
JUL 7








                                Lt. Gen. Nadja Y. West on the Power of Empathy            
JUN 30








                                Joe Andrew on Building a Culture to Encourage Creativity            
JUN 23












What's Next


Loading...









Go to Home Page »

Site Index

The New York Times


























Citrix profit rises; CEO Templeton to retire - MarketWatch




























































Latest News










Dow

21,522
-89.70
-0.42%






Nasdaq

6,371
-18.89
-0.30%






S&P 500

2,466
-7.30
-0.30%









10:59 A.M. ET


                                  Costco price target cut to $180 from $190 at Cowen & Co.
                                





 
10:57 A.M. ET


Updated
      Citi goes neutral on Tesla stock, but counts itself in bull camp
                                





 
10:58 A.M. ET


                                  GE stock price target cut to $27 from $36 at CFRA
                                





 
10:57 A.M. ET


                                  GE downgraded to hold from buy at CFRA
                                





 
10:54 A.M. ET


                                  Tour de France: Do You Know What Day It Is?
                                





 
10:40 A.M. ET


                                  Germany's DAX 30 drops 1.9% as part of selloff in European stocks 
                                





 
10:34 A.M. ET


Opinion
      These 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
                                





 
10:34 A.M. ET


                                  California wildfire raging near Yosemite National Park displaces at least 5,000 residents
                                





 
10:31 A.M. ET


                                  Christopher Nolan’s ‘Dunkirk’: 'Virtual Reality Without the Headset'
                                





 
10:25 A.M. ET


Updated
      Here’s something that can improve your memory — and help you sleep
                                





 
10:24 A.M. ET


Updated
      Still not losing weight? These may be the reasons why
                                





 
10:22 A.M. ET


                                  Mastercard welcomes UK court ruling to block $18 billion class action suit
                                





 
10:21 A.M. ET


                                  Sam Adams’ new 12-pack offers up its dream team
                                





 
10:14 A.M. ET


Updated
      U.S. stocks fall from near-records, with GE a particular drag
                                





 
10:12 A.M. ET


Updated
      Dow's early tumble is broad based and led by Goldman, GE and Caterpillar stocks
                                





 
10:12 A.M. ET


                                  Seven years after Dodd-Frank passage, there still aren’t proposals for a fifth of rules
                                





 
10:00 A.M. ET


Updated
      Euro sits at 2-year high as hawkish view on  ECB dominates
                                





 
9:59 A.M. ET


Updated
      Microsoft rides huge tax benefit from failing at smartphones to big earnings beat 
                                





 
9:58 A.M. ET


Updated
      Amazon effect blamed for spike in default rate among riskier retailers 
                                





 
9:58 A.M. ET


Updated
      Amazon’s foray into groceries means more mergers of food companies, experts say
                                





 








































Log In















 


Until London Markets Close

Currencies
Futures
Metals Stocks














Home






Industries







Computers/Electronics








         Citrix profit rises; CEO Templeton to retire
    








    By
        
        Anna Prior

Published: Jan 29, 2014 4:57 p.m. ET

Share


















































 



 




















By

                                        AnnaPrior







Citrix Systems Inc.'s 

                            
                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                  
                                    CTXS, -0.42%

                            
                                  
      
      
      
      
      
      
      
                                         fourth-quarter earnings rose 22% as the company also said its Chief Executive Officer Mark B. Templeton will be returning from a previously announced leave of absence, but that he plans to retire within the next year. Citrix said Templeton's retirement is subject to the naming of his successor. The company's board has formed a committee of independent directors to lead a search for the next CEO, and David J. Henshall, who has been serving as acting CEO during Mr. Templeton's absence, has been promoted to chief operating officer, the company said. Meanwhile, shares fell in recent after-hours trading as Citrix provided an outlook for the first-quarter and recently started year that was below Wall Street's expectations. For the year, Citrix said it expects per-share adjusted earnings of $2.85 to $2.95 on revenue growth of 8% to 10%. Analysts polled by Thomson Reuters were looking for earnings of $3.35 a share and revenue growth of about 11% to $3.25 billion. For the first-quarter, the company forecast adjusted earnings of 57 cents to 60 cents a share on revenue of growth of 8% to 10%. Analysts projected earnings of 69 cents a share and revenue growth of about 11% to $746.5 million. Citrix improves efficiency by allowing multiple systems to operate on one computer. The company had posted quarterly double-digit revenue gains for more than three years as it benefited from increased demand for desktop virtualization, a crucial step in cloud computing. For the latest quarter, Citrix reported a profit of $138.6 million, or 74 cents a share, up from $114 million, or 60 cents a share a year ago. Excluding compensation expenses and other items, per-share earnings rose to $1.04 from 90 cents. Revenue rose 8.4% to $802.4 million. The company in October had forecast adjusted earnings of 95 cents to $1 a share and revenue of $800 million to $810 million, below analysts' estimates at the time. Revenue from product and licenses, or new product purchases, edged up 0.5% to $269.9 million. Revenue from license updates, which includes annuity revenue from subscriptions paid when new licenses are purchased, rose 11%. Software-as-a-service revenue was up 13%, while professional-services revenue rose 28%. Gross margin narrowed to 83% from 84.1%. Operating expenses climbed 5.8%. The stock has fallen 16% in the last 12 months. Write to Anna Prior at anna.prior@wsj.com Subscribe to WSJ: http://online.wsj.com?mod=djnwires


More from MarketWatch









More Coverage


How OPEC committee’s coming meeting could make or break oil prices


The reason Jack Bogle doesn’t fly first class says everything about his investing legacy


This is the deadliest time of your life to put on weight

















Quote References


CTXS

-0.35
-0.42%





Most Popular





The dark side of cruises





The reason Jack Bogle doesn’t fly first class says everything about his investing legacy





Trump reshuffles legal team, Kasowitz out: reports





Here is why your savings rate is more important than your investments’ returns





Whirlpool and 4 Other Cheap Stocks Rising




MarketWatch Partner Center




















 








            We Want to
            Hear from You


Join the conversation
Comment
















Sponsored Headlines













Advanced Search







Stocks



Columns


Authors


Topics







No results found




























Citrix Systems Inc.
U.S.: Nasdaq: CTXS




$82.23

-0.35
(-0.42%)








Volume143.4K
Open$82.18
High$82.66
Low$82.06
P/E Ratio27.05
Div Yield0
Market Cap12.5B
























 






















Business Industry - Industry News - Industry Market Reports


























Bulletin






Investor Alert







London Markets Close in:



Currencies
Futures
Metals Stocks




















  
      Industries
    




        Latest Industry News
    


Citi goes neutral on Tesla stock, but counts itself in bull camp
              
              Analysts at Citi start their coverage of Tesla with a neutral rating and a price target about 10% higher than the current share price.               
              
            

2 min ago10:57 a.m. July 21, 2017








S&P 500





/conga/industries/main2.html
28078





        In Energy »




Dundee Energy Announces Receipt of Demand for Repayment of Outstanding Indebtedness
              
              Dundee Energy Announces Receipt of Demand for Repayment of Outstanding Indebtedness              
              
            

4 min ago10:55 a.m. July 21, 2017






Dundee Energy Announces Receipt of Demand for Repayment of Outstanding Indebtedness
              
              Dundee Energy Announces Receipt of Demand for Repayment of Outstanding Indebtedness              
              
            

4 min ago10:55 a.m. July 21, 2017






A.M. Best Affirms Credit Ratings of Nuclear Electric Insurance Limited
              
              A.M. Best Affirms Credit Ratings of Nuclear Electric Insurance Limited              
              
            

23 min ago10:36 a.m. July 21, 2017








        In Banking »




Mastercard welcomes UK court ruling to block $18 billion class action suit
              
              Mastercard Inc.  on Friday welcomed a decision by a U.K. court to block a 14 billion pound ($18 billion) class action suit against the company that alleged it had overcharged more than 45 million Britons over a 16-year stretch. The Competition Appeal Tribunal sided with the card issuer, which argued that the claims were unsuitable to be brought under a collective actions regime. "We welcome the Competition Appeal Tribunal's judgment refusing certification for the proposed collective action," the company said in a statement. The suit was brought by law firm Quinn Emanuel Urquhart & Sullivan LLP, and centered on interchange fees, which are charged to the banks of merchants that accept MasterCard debit and credit cards. The firm alleged that Mastercard had set fees at too high a level. Mastercard shares were up 0.6% and have gained 25% in 2017, while the Dow Jones Industrial Average  has gained 9%.                
              
            

37 min ago10:22 a.m. July 21, 2017






Seven years after Dodd-Frank passage, there still aren’t proposals for a fifth of rules
              
              Financial regulators have written over 26,000 pages of rules for the landmark Dodd-Frank bank reform law passed seven years ago. But there’s still 20% of the Dodd-Frank requirements left to go.               
              
            

48 min ago10:12 a.m. July 21, 2017






Stocks are healthy enough to rally without tech
              
              Even if Alphabet and other ‘heavily overweighted’ tech stars falter, Michael Kahn expects a strong stock market overall.              
              
            

8:46 a.m.  Today8:46 a.m. July 21, 2017








/conga/modules/sixwide-divider.html
3095





        In Technology »




Newspaper publisher McClatchy Co. reports Q2 loss, but growth in digital business
              
              Newspaper publisher McClatchy Co.  reported second-quarter earnings before the market opened on Friday and said digital-only subscribers grew nearly 14% from the previous year's first quarter. The company reported a net loss of $37.4 million, or $4.91 per share for the second quarter, compared with a loss of $14.7 million, or $1.89 per share during the same quarter a year ago. The adjusted loss per share was 79 cents. McClatchy's revenue hit $225.1 million in the quarter, down 7% compared with the prior year. Total advertising revenue revenues were down 11% compared with the same quarter last year, while digital-only advertising revenue grew by 10%. The company said that the rate of decline in total advertising slowed in the quarter. "As I have mentioned before, achieving a normalized operating environment takes some time in digital transitions," McClatchy Chief Executive Craig Forman said in a statement. "While we continue to see strong headwinds in print advertising, we also are seeing our digital efforts in all aspects of the business moderate those headwinds." McClatchy's average total unique visitors to the company's online products grew close to 15% to 66 million in the quarter. Shares of McClatchy were inactive in morning trade on Friday, but have declined more than 34% in the year to date, while the S&P 500 index  have gained more than 10%.              
              
            

9:43 a.m.  Today9:43 a.m. July 21, 2017






Whole Foods shareholders to vote on Amazon merger on Aug. 23
              
              Whole Foods Market Inc.  informed its shareholders that the special meeting to vote on the acquisition by Amazon.com Inc. will be held on Aug. 23. The shareholder meeting will be at the natural and organic foods seller's corporate headquarters in Austin, Texas, and will begin at 8:30 a.m. local time. "The Whole Foods Market board of directors unanimously recommends that our shareholders vote 'FOR' the proposal to approve the merger agreement," a letter to shareholders said. Whole Foods had agreed on June 15 to be bought by Amazon for $42 a share, which was 47% above the 2017 closing low of $28.53 on March 27, but was 36% below the Oct. 25, 2013 record close of $65.24. The stock closed Thursday at $41.76. Amazon shares have run up 14.5% over the past three months, while the S&P 500  has gained 5.3%.              
              
            

8:06 a.m.  Today8:06 a.m. July 21, 2017






EBay's stock tumbles after results, but analyst says 'buy the pullback'
              
              Shares of EBay Inc.  tumbled 5.1% in premarket trade Friday, after the e-commerce company's second-quarter results disappointed investors who were looking for a lot more than just matching analyst estimates. The stock had shot up 9.3% in two weeks to a record close ahead of the results, which were released after Thursday's close. Analyst Shyam Patil at Susquehanna recommended investors "buy the pullback" as the results show the turnaround is on track and given expectations of an expected growth acceleration in the second half of the year. Patil raised the stock price target to $41 from $40. J.P. Morgan nalyst Doug Anmuth said the results reflect "improving fundamentals," and therefore raised his stock price target to $38 from $34, but acknowledged that "expectations were elevated" given the recent rally. "Overall, we do not think the bull or bear thesis changes much with this print," Anmuth wrote in a note to clients. The stock has run up 25.2% year to date through Thursday, while the SPDR Technology Select Sector ETF  has climbed 19.0% and the S&P 500  has gained 10.5%.              
              
            

7:46 a.m.  Today7:46 a.m. July 21, 2017








        In Cars »




Polaris beats profit and sales expectation as ORV and snowmobile growth helps boost results
              
              Polaris Industries Inc.  reported Thursday a second-quarter net profit that fell to $62.0 million, or 97 cents a share, from $71.2 million, or $1.09 a share, in the same period a year ago. The off-road vehicle maker said adjusted earnings per share came to $1.16, above the FactSet consensus of $1.08. Revenue rose to $1.36 billion from $1.13 billion, beating the FactSet consensus of $1.26 billion. Off-road and snowmobile sales rose to $845.5 million from $799.3 million, above the FactSet consensus of $761.7 million, while motorcycle sales fell 13% to $198 million but beat expectations of $192 million. The company raised its 2017 sales growth outlook to 12% to 14% from 10% to 13% and its adjusted EPS outlook to $4.35 to $4.50 from $4.25 to $4.50. "The powersports industry remained very competitive and headwinds persist, but we were encouraged by the return to growth in our Side-by-Side business and continued strength and aggressive share gains for Indian Motorcycles," said Chief Executive Scott Wine. On Wednesday, the company said it recalled 25,600 ATVs after reports of fuel leaks and fires. The stock, which wasn't active in premarket trade, has rallied 12.2% year to date, while the S&P 500  has gained 10.5%.              
              
            

7:46 a.m. July 20, 2017






Tesla stock initiated as neutral/high risk at Citi with price target 10% above current price
              
              Citigroup initiated coverage of electric car maker Tesla Inc.  Thursday, with a neutral/high risk rating and $357 stock price target. That's equal to about 10% upside from its current level. "We're positive on Tesla's position as a Car of the Future leader and view the upside case to still be significant, however, we prefer to wait for a better entry point either through: (a) A stronger balance sheet, which in our view would more favorably tilt the 12-month risk/reward equation, all-else-equal; or (b) convincing signs of a smooth Model 3 ramp with limited Model S cannibalization," analyst Itay Michaeli wrote in a note. The analyst said he is "fundamentally bullish" on Tesla, but that both bull and bear cases for the stock have merit. On the bull side, the company has had initial product success, brand appeal, speed of innovation and tech/software leadership," he wrote. The next 12 months rely on Tesla achieving Model 3 conversions and meeting margin goals, while continuing to cement its leadership in self-driving. Tesla shares were slightly lower premarket, but have gained 52% in 2017, while the S&P 500  has gained 10.5%.               
              
            

7:27 a.m. July 20, 2017






Polaris recalls tens of thousands of ATVs after reports of fire, fuel leaks
              
              Recreational vehicles company Polaris Industries Inc.  recalled about 25,600 all-terrain vehicles (ATVs) after reports of fuel leaks and fires. The recall involves 2014 Sportsman 570 model ATVs sold from April 2014 through May 2017 for $6,500 to $7,700 in several colors, which were made by Polaris in the U.S., according to the Consumer Product Safety Commission. The recall follows 30 reports of fuel leaks and four incidents involving a fire, although no injuries had been reported. "Consumers should immediately stop using the recalled ATVs and contact Polaris to schedule a free repair," the company said in a statement. "Polaris is contacting all known purchasers directly." The stock, which was up 1.2% in afternoon trade, has rallied 12.9% year to date, while the S&P 500  has gained 10.4%.              
              
            

2:48 p.m. July 19, 2017








/conga/modules/sixwide-divider.html
3095





        In Retail »




These 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
              
              It wasn’t Trump’s “movement” that lifted stocks late last year, says Jeff Reeves. It was the promise of lower corporate tax rates.               
              
            

25 min ago10:34 a.m. July 21, 2017






U.S. stocks fall from near-records, with GE a particular drag
              
              U.S. stocks fell on Friday, with major indexes retreating from record levels and a lengthy string of gains, with industrial stocks particularly lower following results from General Electric Co. and Honeywell International Inc.              
              
            

45 min ago10:14 a.m. July 21, 2017






Amazon effect blamed for spike in default rate among riskier retailers 
              
              The U.S. retail trailing 12-month high-yield default rate rose to 2.9% in mid-July from 1.8% at the end of June, after J. Crew completed a $566 million distressed debt exchange, according to Fitch Ratings.              
              
            

9:58 a.m.  Today9:58 a.m. July 21, 2017








        In Health Care »




Amazon’s foray into groceries means more mergers of food companies, experts say
              
              The pace of mergers and acquisitions in the food industry has gained steam in 2017, and experts are expecting more to come as companies struggle with shrinking margins in a low-price world..              
              
            

9:58 a.m.  Today9:58 a.m. July 21, 2017






Endo to cut 875 jobs and close facilities in Alabama
              
              Endo International PLC  said Friday it was cutting 875 jobs, which is about 18% of its workforce, as part of a restructuring aimed at cutting costs by up to $65 million a year. The pharmaceutical company said it will close manufacturing and distribution facilities in Huntsville, Ala. over the next 12-to-18 months, as a result of declining volumes of commoditized products. Endo expects to record restructuring charges of $325 million, including cash charges of $60 million. "Today's announced action enables a redeployment of investment from commoditized products to more differentiated capabilities and products that represent our core areas of future growth," said Chief Executive Paul Campanelli. The stock, which slipped 0.5% in premarket trade, has tumbled 25.2% year to date through Thursday, while SPDR S&P Pharmaceuticals ETF  has climbed 13.2% and the S&P 500  has gained 10.5%.              
              
            

8:41 a.m.  Today8:41 a.m. July 21, 2017






Attention, shoppers: ‘Amazon effect’ is creating bargain stocks
              
              Jefferies analysts say investors are discounting some consumer stocks too much.              
              
            

7:29 a.m.  Today7:29 a.m. July 21, 2017

















Most Popular





1.






The dark side of cruises






2.






The reason Jack Bogle doesn’t fly first class says everything about his investing legacy






3.






Trump reshuffles legal team, Kasowitz out: reports






4.





Personal Finance Daily

Here is why your savings rate is more important than your investments’ returns






5.





Barron's Bounce

Whirlpool and 4 Other Cheap Stocks Rising










Find a Broker

Partner Center »

















            SPONSORED SECTIONS
    


Compare current broker offers 






Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




11:00 AM EDT
July 21, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Open


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
10:59aCostco price target cut to $180 from $190 at Cowen & Co.
10:58aGE stock price target cut to $27 from $36 at CFRA
10:58aCiti goes neutral on Tesla stock, but counts itself in bull camp
10:58aGE downgraded to hold from buy at CFRA
10:54aTour de France: Do You Know What Day It Is?
10:40aGermany's DAX 30 drops 1.9% as part of selloff in European stocks 
10:34aThese 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
10:34aCalifornia wildfire raging near Yosemite National Park displaces at least 5,000 residents
10:31aChristopher Nolan’s ‘Dunkirk’: 'Virtual Reality Without the Headset'
10:25aHere’s something that can improve your memory — and help you sleep
10:25aStill not losing weight? These may be the reasons why
10:22aMastercard welcomes UK court ruling to block $18 billion class action suit
10:21aSam Adams’ new 12-pack offers up its dream team
10:15aU.S. stocks fall from near-records, with GE a particular drag
10:13aDow's early tumble is broad based and led by Goldman, GE and Caterpillar stocks
10:12aSeven years after Dodd-Frank passage, there still aren’t proposals for a fifth of rules
10:00aEuro sits at 2-year high as hawkish view on  ECB dominates
9:59aMicrosoft rides huge tax benefit from failing at smartphones to big earnings beat 
9:59aAmazon effect blamed for spike in default rate among riskier retailers 
9:59aAmazon’s foray into groceries means more mergers of food companies, experts say
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,522.69

-89.09
-0.41%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,371.26

-18.74
-0.29%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,466.14

-7.31
-0.30%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15





















































Computers - Electronics - Tech - Industry - MarketWatch
























Bulletin






Investor Alert







London Markets Close in:



Currencies
Futures
Metals Stocks

















  
      Computers & Electronics
    





Super Micro warns of profit shortfall, stock falls more than 10%

					Super Micro Computer Inc.  fell more than 10% in late trading Thursday after disclosing that profit came up short of projections, partly due to the high cost of memory chips. The high-performance computing company said that adjusted profit will be 35 cents to 37 cents a share, lower than previous guidance of 40 cents to 50 cents a share. The announcement noted three causes for a nine-cent downfall per share: "expiring customer agreements with unfavorable DRAM and SSD pricing; urgent new projects with unanticipated R & D expense from major partners with NRE to be recovered in later quarters; and tax impact due to our global corporate tax structure." The cost for dynamic random access memory, or DRAM, and solid-state drives, or SSDs, have spiked in the past year, harming profit for many computer companies. Super Micro said it would report revenue at or above the high end of its previous guidance range of $655 million to $715 million, with expectations for sales now at $712 million to $717 million. Chief Executive Charles Liang promised more details when the company fully reports earnings on Aug. 3. Super Micro stock declined to around $24.15 after closing with a 2.3% increase at $27.10.
					
					
5:16 p.m. July 20, 2017







Apple's stock ends seesaw session with a loss to snap win streak at 9 sessions

					Apple Inc.'s stock  ended a seesaw session Thursday in negative territory, snapping its win streak at nine sessions despite continued gains in the broader technology sector. The stock rallied as much as 0.5% to an intraday high of $151.74 in the opening minutes, then fell as much as 0.5% to an intraday low of $150.19 at about 10:40 a.m. ET, then turned positive again around midday before falling to close at $150.34. The nine-session losing streak was the longest since the nine-session stretch ending Aug. 25, 2014. Meanwhile, the tech-heavy Nasdaq 100  ticked up 0.1%, marking a 10th straight gain. Apple's stock has rallied 29.8% year to date, while the Nasdaq 100 has climbed 21.8% and the Dow Jones Industrial Average  has gained 9.4%.
					
					
4:31 p.m. July 20, 2017







Qualcomm forecast disappoints amid Apple fight

					Qualcomm Inc.  met expectations with its quarterly earnings report Wednesday, but shares fell as the company's forecast excluded any sales related to Apple Inc.  products and came in less than expected amid a legal battle with the iPhone maker. Qualcomm reported fiscal third-quarter net income of $866 million, or 58 cents a share, on revenue of $5.37 billion. Qualcomm was expected on average to report adjusted earnings of 83 cents a share on revenue of $5.28 billion, according to a FactSet analyst survey. Qualcomm's forecast was more highly anticipated, however, amid a big fight between Qualcomm and Apple over the licensing fees Qualcomm commands for its patented technologies, but Qualcomm did not include licensing fees in its forecast. "Our financial guidance for the fourth quarter of fiscal 2017 excludes QTL revenues related to the sale of Apple products by Apple's contract manufacturers as well as the other licensee in dispute as we expect the recent actions taken by these licensees will continue until the respective disputes are resolved," the company said in its release. Qualcomm predicted adjusted earnings of 75 cents to 85 cents 
a share on sales of $5.4 billion to $6.2 billion. Analysts on average expected the fourth-quarter forecast to call for adjusted earnings per share of 93 cents on revenue of $5.51 billion, according to FactSet. Qualcomm shares dipped about 3% in late trading after the report was released, following a 0.9% gain in regular trading.
					
					
4:25 p.m. July 19, 2017









        Computers & Electronics Headlines
    


Apple's stock gains to stretch win streak to 9 sessions
              
              Apple Inc.'s stock  edged up 0.4% in morning trade Wednesday, but that slight gain put it on track to match the longest win streak in three years. The stock is headed for the ninth-straight gain, the longest such streak since the nine-day stretch ending Aug. 25, 2014. There hasn't been a 10-session win streak since Oct. 18, 2010. J.P. Morgan analyst Rod Hall reiterated on Wednesday his overweight rating and price target of $165, which is 9.6% above current levels. He said that production of new iPhone to be released in the fall appear to be off to a slow start, but he believes those concerns are already reflected in the stock price. "Importantly, we do not believe that Apple's production schedule is still changing materially with most current delay reports simply dated reverberations of decisions Apple made back in the spring," Hall wrote in a note to clients. Apple's stock has now climbed 5.6% during its current win streak, but was still 3.5% below the May 12 record close of $156.10. Year to date, it's up 30%, while the Dow Jones Industrial Average  had gained 9.3%.              
              
            

11:36 a.m. July 19, 2017






Tech companies hoarded the most cash of any sector in 2016: Moody's
              
              U.S. tech companies continued to hoard the most cash of any sector in 2016, according to a Moody's Investors Service report published Wednesday. Apple Inc. , Microsoft Corp. , Google , Cisco Inc.  and Oracle Corp.  led the pack with a combined total of $594 billion, the rating agency said in a new report. Apple alone held $246 billion, or 13.2% of the total corporate cashpile, up 12.8% from $216 billion in 2015. Overall, non-financial companies had $1.84 trillion in cash at year-end, up 9.2% from the year-earlier period. Overseas cash is about $1.3 trillion, or 70% of the total, said the report. The most cash-rich sectors are tech, health care, consumer products and energy with a combined $1.46 trillion, or 79% of the total. The tech sector had a combined $871 billion. "Offshore cash holdings will continue to grow absent tax reform," said Moody's.               
              
            

10:12 a.m. July 19, 2017






Cray to slash workforce by about 14%, most by the end of the week
              
              Cray Inc.  disclosed Wednesday it plans to cut 190 jobs, which is about 14% of its workforce, as part of a restructuring plan aimed at cutting costs by $25 million a year. The supercomputing company said in a filing with the Securities and Exchange Commission that the "vast majority" of the job cuts will be effective July 21. The cuts will affect "all organizations and major geographies" of the company. Cray said it expects to record restructuring charges of $10 million, most of which will be recorded during the third quarter. The stock, which was still inactive in premarket trade, has lost 8.7% year to date, while the SPDR Technology Select Sector ETF  has run up 18% and the S&P 500  has gained 9.9%.              
              
            

9:20 a.m. July 19, 2017






Apple announces new leader in China amid sagging sales
              
              Apple Inc.  announced Tuesday evening that Isabel Ge Mahe will take on a new role as leader of the company's efforts in China, amid a sales downturn for the iPhone maker in the world's most populous country. Mahe, previously vice president of wireless technologies for the tech giant, will take over the newly created role of vice president and managing director of Greater China, the company said in an announcement. "Apple is strongly committed to invest and grow in China, and we are thrilled that Isabel will be bringing her experience and leadership to our China team," Chief Executive Tim Cook said in the release. Apple sales in China have declined for five consecutive quarters after a 14% drop in the most recent earnings report, as Asian smartphone manufacturers have become more competitive in the region. Apple is scheduled to report earnings for its fiscal third quarter on Aug. 1. The company's stock finished off an eighth consecutive positive trading session Tuesday, its longest winning streak in three years; shares have now gained 29.6% so far this year, while the Dow Jones industrial average  has increased 9.2% and the S&P 500 index  has gained 9.9%.              
              
            

8:48 p.m. July 18, 2017






Broadcom, Brocade merger delayed
              
              Brocade Communications Systems Inc.  said late Tuesday the closing of its deal with Broadcom Ltd.  has been delayed to give a U.S. government inter-agency committee more time to go over the proposed deal. Broadcom agreed to buy Brocade last year, and shareholders approved the deal in January. Earlier this week, however, following discussions with the U.S. Committee on Foreign Investment, the companies agreed to withdraw and re-file a voluntary notice to the committee to allow more time for a review. Once the committee accepts the notice, a new 30-day review period will start, and that may be followed by a 45-day investigation period, Brocade said. Shares of Brocade rose 0.2% in late trading and ended the day down 0.5%; shares of Broadcom rose 0.5% in the late session and ended the regular session up 0.8%. "Brocade and Broadcom have been and will continue to be actively engaged with CFIUS during its review of the proposed acquisition. There can be no assurances, however, that CFIUS will ultimately agree that the parties may proceed with the proposed acquisition," they said. The delay also affects Extreme Networks Inc. , which had agreed to buy Brocade's data-center networking business from Broadcom. Extreme said in a statement it expects to close its transaction with Broadcom within two to three business days of the completed acquisition of Brocade by Broadcom.              
              
            

5:48 p.m. July 18, 2017






Apple's stock reverses higher to post longest win streak in 3 years 
              
              Shares of Apple Inc.  erased an early loss to close up 0.3% Tuesday, to stretch its winning streak to eight sessions. That's the longest such streak since the nine-session stretch ending Aug. 25, 2014. The stock was down as much as 0.6% at the intraday low of $148.67 around 10:05 a.m. ET, the started rising to close just below its intraday high of $150.13. The stock has rallied 5.2% during its streak, but is still 4% away from the May 12 record close of $156.10. Apple's win streak matches that of the tech-heavy Nasdaq 100 , which has also gained for eight straight sessions, matching the eight-day win streak it managed seven weeks ago. Meanwhile, the Dow Jones Industrial Average  has declined two straight days, and in three of the past eight sessions.              
              
            

4:44 p.m. July 18, 2017






IBM revenue continues to fall
              
              International Business Machines Corp.  sales declined year-over-year for the 21st consecutive quarter, the tech company announced Tuesday, but the company's cloud revenue continued to grow. IBM reported profit of $2.3 billion, or $2.48 a share, on sales of $19.3 billion for its second quarter, with earnings falling 7% from the same quarter a year ago and revenue dropping 5%. After adjusting for acquisition- and retirement-related expenses, the company claimed earnings of $2.97 a share, up 1% from a year ago. Analysts on average expected adjusted profit of $2.74 a share on sales of $19.5 billion. Cloud revenue gained 15% from last year to $3.9 billion, and IBM maintained its outlook for the full year. Shares, which closed with a 0.7% gain at $154, declined about 2% after the results were announced.              
              
            

4:23 p.m. July 18, 2017






Apple's stock leads Dow gainers after analyst boosts price target
              
              Shares of Apple Inc.  surged 0.8% in morning trade Monday, enough to pace the Dow Jones Industrial Average's  gainers, after Morgan Stanley raised its price target, to be the third highest among the 44 analysts surveyed by FactSet. The stock's price gain of $1.23 was adding about 8.5 points to the price of the Dow's, which was down 14 points. Analyst Katy Huberty bumped her price target up to $182 from $177. The new target is 21% above current levels, 12% above the average target of the 44 analysts surveyed by FactSet of $162.12. When Apple reports on Aug. 1, Huberty expects the company to provide a "weaker-than-consensus" outlook for its fourth quarter ending in September, because of the slightly later iPhone launch than typical--October shipment rather than the usual September. But that delay "creates a dynamic of much better-than-normal December and March quarter seasonality, providing an attractive set up for the stock looking beyond the September guide," Huberty wrote in a note to clients. The stock has rallied 5.9% over the past three months, while the tech-heavy Nasdaq 100  has climbed 8.4% and the Dow Jones Industrial Average  has gained 4.8%.              
              
            

10:33 a.m. July 17, 2017








				Video
		



Before NASA can send humans to Mars, it needs to solve these problems









34c38fb4-2818-4c49-a248-bb2b3086d933

Before NASA can send humans to Mars, it needs to solve these problems 2:32
					

54948a7f-ee13-4bcc-8098-22a2a78b7192

First Look: An E-bike That Fits in Your Backpack 1:26
					

317146a2-6a70-40b8-9159-8e7ba8b27210

Here are the Five Worst Travel Mistakes You're Making 1:42
					

557c9a04-9153-417e-a58a-931ab36cac09

A Divided Turkey Celebrates Failed Coup 2:03
					



1b77410b-8daf-4e83-b4cd-25d30f89815e

What marriage-phobic millennials mean for the wedding-ring industry 2:14
					

193c5fed-622f-4810-b9cf-313b04fc8888

3D-Printed Hair System Helps Cancer Survivor Move On 3:35
					

9319c49e-5f2f-4d4a-b40a-1453ad867043

How the rise of drones is posing a major security nightmare 2:22
					

b7b700e6-bc30-4d5e-9a27-4079304db7e7

Dirty Money: There's Cocaine on Your Cash 1:03
					



b1276b18-0f76-4cb6-aad3-43d2a1c7bbb0

On the Hunt for a New Job While Homeless 4:47
					

8aa93cf8-0626-4adb-a48d-578cf95d3241

The new frontier for vision companies: Colorblindness 2:59
					






        More Computers & Electronics Stories
    


AMD's stock bounces; options traders prep for volatile post-earnings move

10:29 a.m. July 14, 2017






AMD's stock reverses sharply lower on heavy volume, as ethereum prices extend selloff

3:35 p.m. July 13, 2017






Applied Optoelectronics expects to report profit and sales above expectations

8:49 a.m. July 13, 2017






HP officially takes back throne of world's largest PC manufacturer

4:41 p.m. July 12, 2017






Nvidia stock rallies toward 6th-straight gain after SunTrust RH upgrade

8:31 a.m. July 12, 2017






Cohu rallies on strong revenue growth

4:49 p.m. July 11, 2017






Rambus's stock spikes higher in active trade amid reports that a sale is being considered

1:57 p.m. July 7, 2017






AMD's stock surges to lead S&P 500 gainers in active trade

11:37 a.m. July 7, 2017



















Most Popular





1.






The dark side of cruises






2.






The reason Jack Bogle doesn’t fly first class says everything about his investing legacy






3.






Trump reshuffles legal team, Kasowitz out: reports






4.





Personal Finance Daily

Here is why your savings rate is more important than your investments’ returns






5.





Barron's Bounce

Whirlpool and 4 Other Cheap Stocks Rising










Find a Broker

Partner Center »

















            SPONSORED SECTIONS
    


Compare current broker offers 






Trending Tickers


/quotes/zigman/17636479/composite VUZI+15.60%


/quotes/zigman/237947/composite JCP-5.83%


/quotes/zigman/59392505/composite NUGT-2.93%


/quotes/zigman/59386294/composite JNUG-5.94%


/quotes/zigman/65801738/composite TLT+1.11%


X




Powered by














Log In




11:00 AM EDT
July 21, 2017


/marketstate/country/us
New York

	Open


/marketstate/country/uk
London

	Open


/marketstate/country/jp
Tokyo

	Closed





/marketstate/country/us
 


/marketstate/country/uk
 


/marketstate/country/jp
 











View All



Latest News

/news/latest
10:59aCostco price target cut to $180 from $190 at Cowen & Co.
10:58aGE stock price target cut to $27 from $36 at CFRA
10:58aCiti goes neutral on Tesla stock, but counts itself in bull camp
10:58aGE downgraded to hold from buy at CFRA
10:54aTour de France: Do You Know What Day It Is?
10:40aGermany's DAX 30 drops 1.9% as part of selloff in European stocks 
10:34aThese 7 highly taxed companies need Congress to finally act on tax reform
10:34aCalifornia wildfire raging near Yosemite National Park displaces at least 5,000 residents
10:31aChristopher Nolan’s ‘Dunkirk’: 'Virtual Reality Without the Headset'
10:25aHere’s something that can improve your memory — and help you sleep
10:25aStill not losing weight? These may be the reasons why
10:22aMastercard welcomes UK court ruling to block $18 billion class action suit
10:21aSam Adams’ new 12-pack offers up its dream team
10:15aU.S. stocks fall from near-records, with GE a particular drag
10:13aDow's early tumble is broad based and led by Goldman, GE and Caterpillar stocks
10:12aSeven years after Dodd-Frank passage, there still aren’t proposals for a fifth of rules
10:00aEuro sits at 2-year high as hawkish view on  ECB dominates
9:59aMicrosoft rides huge tax benefit from failing at smartphones to big earnings beat 
9:59aAmazon effect blamed for spike in default rate among riskier retailers 
9:59aAmazon’s foray into groceries means more mergers of food companies, experts say
Loading more headlines...




dow

/quotes/zigman/627449/realtime
21,522.69

-89.09
-0.41%





nasdaq

/quotes/zigman/12633936/realtime
6,371.26

-18.74
-0.29%





s&p 500

/quotes/zigman/3870025/realtime
2,466.14

-7.31
-0.30%













Kiosk


1352872800000
1352872800000


The RetireMentors






				Retirement advice from our industry experts
				Our team of financial professionals can help you plan and save 
					for retirement, then 
				live well in it.



/conga/kiosk/retirementors.html
361307




1320411600000
1320616500000


Alerts



/conga/kiosk/alerts.html
310238




1333717800000
1333964100000


Virtual Stock Exchange





Our free stock-market game
				• Trade your virtual portfolio in real time
				• Talk strategies in group discussions
				• Find or create a game that suits you
				• Use our learning center to improve 



/conga/kiosk/games.html
310284




1245657600000
1277280000000


Location Scouts




Housing-market insights from our realty pros
																																																							Plus the latest data from Realtor.com on 21 home markets across the U.S.
• See our complete Real Estate site


/conga/kiosk/real_estate.html
357012




1404799200000
1404799200000


Lazy Portfolios





				Set it and forget it
				Check out the returns on our 8 Lazy Portfolios that are made up 
				of low-cost 
				buy-and-hold index funds.

				• How to create your own Lazy Portfolio


/conga/kiosk/lazy_portfolio.html
313134














MarketWatch.com




Site Index
Topics
Help
Feedback
Newsroom Roster

                    Media Archive
Premium Products
Mobile


Company Info
Code of Conduct
Corrections
Advertising Media Kit
Advertise Locally
Reprints & Licensing
Broker Center

                    Your Ad Choices


Follow MarketWatch


































RSS
Podcasts






WSJ.com
Barron's Online
BigCharts
Virtual Stock Exchange


Financial News London
WSJ.com Small Business
realtor.com
Mansion Global












		Copyright © 2017 MarketWatch, Inc.  All rights reserved.
		By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Service,
        Privacy Policy and Cookie Policy.
	



            Intraday Data provided by SIX Financial Information and subject to terms of use. Historical and current end-of-day data provided by SIX Financial Information. All quotes are in local exchange time. Real-time last sale data for U.S. stock quotes reflect trades reported through Nasdaq only. Intraday data delayed at least 15 minutes or per exchange requirements.
        






MarketWatch Top Stories
Link to MarketWatch's Slice.

15






















































Citrix Announces CEO Succession Plan (NASDAQ:CTXS)
















 








  
                    
                       
                           
   
	  





Share this on:



 Delicious


 Digg


 Facebook


 LinkedIn


 Twitter





What is this?







« Previous Release | Next Release »














July 28, 2015

Citrix Announces CEO Succession Plan



Mark B. Templeton to retire as president and CEO


Board of directors initiates search to identify successor

 SANTA CLARA, Calif.--(BUSINESS WIRE)--

      Citrix Systems, Inc. (NASDAQ:CTXS) today announced that the company's

      president and chief executive officer, Mark Templeton, has informed the

      board of directors of his plans to retire. Mr. Templeton will continue

      to serve as president and CEO and a director of the company until such

      time as a successor has been appointed.

    


      The Citrix Board has initiated a CEO search process and has retained

      Heidrick & Struggles, a leading executive search firm, to assist with

      the process of identifying and evaluating candidates.

    


      "I will continue to focus on leading Citrix and driving value-creating

      change until we are ready to make a smooth transition," said Mr.

      Templeton. "I have total confidence that the board will identify a great

      candidate to serve Citrix into the future."

    


      "Mark Templeton is a software industry giant. Under his 20 years of

      leadership, Citrix has transformed to a $3b global technology leader,"

      said Thomas Bogan, lead independent director for Citrix. "We look

      forward to continuing to work with Mark to drive the strategy we have

      laid out for the future, while we work to identify his best possible

      successor."

    

About Mark B. Templeton


Mark Templeton has served as President of Citrix since 1998 and Chief

      Executive Officer since 2001. He joined Citrix in 1995 as Vice President

      of Marketing, prior to the company's initial public offering. Under his

      leadership, Citrix has been transformed from one product, one customer

      segment and one go-to-market path, to a global powerhouse with annual

      revenues of $3.14 billion and 100 million users worldwide. Since 2008,

      Mr. Templeton has served on the Board of Directors of Equifax, a global

      information solutions provider. Mr. Templeton holds a Bachelor's degree

      in product design from North Carolina State University and an MBA from

      The University of Virginia's Darden School.

    

About Citrix


Citrix (NASDAQ:CTXS) is leading the transition to software-defining the

      workplace, uniting virtualization, mobility management, networking and

      SaaS solutions to enable new ways for businesses and people to work

      better. Citrix solutions power business mobility through secure, mobile

      workspaces that provide people with instant access to apps, desktops,

      data and communications on any device, over any network and cloud. With

      annual revenue in 2014 of $3.14 billion, Citrix solutions are in use at

      more than 400,000 organizations and by over 100 million users globally.

      Learn more at www.citrix.com.

    

For Citrix Investors



      This release contains forward­looking statements which are made pursuant

      to the safe harbor provisions of Section 27A of the Securities Act of

      1933 and of Section 21E of the Securities Exchange Act of 1934. The

      forward­looking statements in this release do not constitute guarantees

      of future performance. Those statements involve a number of factors that

      could cause actual results to differ materially, including risks

      associated with the impact of the global economy and uncertainty in the

      IT spending environment, revenue growth and recognition of revenue,

      products and services, their development and distribution, product

      demand and pipeline, economic and competitive factors, the Company's key

      strategic relationships, as well as other risks detailed in the

      Company's filings with the Securities and Exchange Commission. Citrix

      assumes no obligation to update any forward­looking information

      contained in this press release or with respect to the announcements

      described herein.

    


      Citrix® is a trademarks or registered trademarks of Citrix Systems, Inc.

      and/or one or more of its subsidiaries, and may be registered in the

      U.S. Patent and Trademark Office and in other countries. All other

      trademarks and registered trademarks are property of their respective

      owners.

    


View source version on businesswire.com: http://www.businesswire.com/news/home/20150728006490/en/

Citrix Systems, Inc.Media Inquiries:Eric Armstrong,

      954-267-2977eric.armstrong@citrix.comorJoele

      Frank, Wilkinson Brimmer KatcherJoele Frank, 212-355-4449orEric

      Brielmann or Jed Repko, 415-869-3950orCitrix Systems, Inc.Investor

      Inquiries:Eduardo Fleites, 954-229-5758eduardo.fleites@citrix.com



Source: Citrix Systems, Inc.

News Provided by Acquire Media

Close window | Back to top

 delicious
 Digg
 Facebook
 LinkedIn
 Twitter







Copyright 2017 Citrix Systems, Inc








 


Mutual Funds | Investments | Franklin Templeton Investments














 

















Close
Welcome to Franklin Templeton. Please help us personalize your experience.
Select one



Individual Investor




Financial Advisor




RIA



Institutional InvestorOpen separate site












Toggle Navigation





















Sign In to Investor Site

User ID



Password





Remember me


Sign In


Forgotten User ID -or- Password?







Don't have an account?


Register Now



Why Register?











Go










Individual Investor



Financial Advisor


RIA



Institutional InvestorOpen separate site







Contact Us


 My Cart (0)
 My Cart (0)




My Cart Summary









View Cart


View cart to edit items or checkout






My Accounts


Sign In/Register




Sign In to Investor Site









Remember me


Sign In


Forgotten User ID -or- Password?







Don't have an account?

Learn More -or- Register Now










United States

Choose Country














Products & Planning




Mutual FundsAll







Mutual Funds - All




Equity




Fixed Income




Multi-Asset




Alternatives






ProductsAll







Products - All




Closed-End Funds




LibertyShares ETFs




Small Business Retirement Plans




Separately Managed Accounts






Fund ResourcesAll







Fund Resources - All




Fund Ratings




Capital Gains Distributions




Detailed Portfolio Holdings




529 Prices & Performance




Quantity Discounts for Class A Shares






Investment GoalsAll







Investment Goals - All




Investor Stories




Individual Retirement




Education Savings




Charitable Giving








Insights




Our OutlooksAll







Our Outlooks - All




Global Market Viewpoints




Macro News




US Market Perspectives






2017 Global Investment Outlook - June UpdateAll







2017 Global Investment Outlook - June Update - All




Global Macro ShiftsAll







Global Macro Shifts - All




Active ViewsAll







Active Views - All




Our BlogsAll







Our Blogs - All









Active Views
Learn More





Resources




LiteratureAll







Literature - All




Order History




Literature Search




Fund Fact Sheets




Fund Prospectuses




Summary Prospectuses




Product Profiles






Investor ToolsAll







Investor Tools - All




Investor Education




Investor Behavior









Open a New Account Online
Opening an account at Franklin Templeton is easier than ever. We offer IRAs and other standard account types.
Start Now






SpryngTM by Franklin Templeton
Spryng is a new crowdfunding tool for college savings where you create a personalized profile and share it with friends and family.
Learn more







Our Approach




Investment ExpertiseAll







Investment Expertise - All




Equity




Fixed Income




Multi-Asset




Alternatives




Franklin Templeton Solutions






Our FirmAll







Our Firm - All




About Franklin Templeton




News Room




Follow Us on Social Media




Contact Us




Franklin Resources Site




CareersAll







Careers - All









Investor Stories
Meet our hypothetical investors.  What will your journey look like?
Read More




Accounts


Open An Account
Open popular accounts online:

Individual Retirement (IRAs)
529 College Savings Plans
Non-Retirement



Tax CenterAll







Tax Center - All




Tax Forms & Statements




Fund Specific Information For Your Tax Returns




Cost Basis Information




Tax FAQs




Account Support HelpAll







Account Support Help - All




Opening an Account




Changing an Account




Account Resources






Forms & ApplicationsAll







Forms & Applications - All




Account Application




IRA Application




Account Options Form




529 Handbook/Application




10 Commonly Used Forms






Sign In / Registration





Sign In




Register for Access




Reset User ID




Reset Password











                    [search.title]
                











Search















Individual Investor



Financial Advisor


RIA



Institutional InvestorOpen separate site







Contact Us


 My Cart (0)
 My Cart (0)




My Cart Summary









View Cart


View cart to edit items or checkout






My Accounts


Sign In/Register




Sign In to Investor Site









Remember me


Sign In


Forgotten User ID -or- Password?







Don't have an account?

Learn More -or- Register Now










United States

Choose Country



























Find a Fund








            Go
        


To view the fund page, click or press the Enter key on the desired fund View All Funds












Equity


Fixed Income


Multi-Asset


Alternatives












WHAT’S BEHIND YOUR INVESTMENT DECISIONS?
Learn how common behaviors can impact your investing success

Learn More





Sign In

User ID



Password





Remember me


Sign In

Forgot User ID?
Forgot Password?











 GAIN FROM OUR PERSPECTIVE







FROM OUR BLOGS


















Dr. Michael Hasenstab in India



A Bright Spot Amongst Emerging Markets

Learn More










Online New Account Application




Learn More










Are You a Financial Advisor?



View Personalized Content

Click Here









   
                                LOAD MORE
                            














            FEATURED FUNDS
        









Read important information about results and other investment disclosures




            View All Mutual Funds
        











FRIAX
(Advisor)


Franklin Income Fund







            Total Net Assets
        

            As of
        06/30/2017

$82,245.9 (M)



            Asset Class
        
Multi-Asset



            Inception Date
        

08/31/1948



            Dividend Frequency
        
Monthly





            As of
        07/20/2017



            NAV
        
 $2.35








            Factsheet
        




Favorite


                    [favorite]
                
















TGBAX
(Advisor)


Templeton Global Bond Fund







            Total Net Assets
        

            As of
        06/30/2017

$39,567.1 (M)



            Asset Class
        
Fixed Income



            Inception Date
        

09/18/1986



            Dividend Frequency
        
Monthly





            As of
        07/20/2017



            NAV
        
 $12.25








            Factsheet
        




Favorite


                    [favorite]
                
















MDISX
(Z)


Franklin Mutual Global Discovery Fund







            Total Net Assets
        

            As of
        06/30/2017

$22,603.5 (M)



            Asset Class
        
Equity



            Inception Date
        

12/31/1992



            Dividend Frequency
        
Semiannually





            As of
        07/20/2017



            NAV
        
 $33.82








            Factsheet
        




Favorite


                    [favorite]
                
















FRDAX
(Advisor)


Franklin Rising Dividends Fund







            Total Net Assets
        

            As of
        06/30/2017

$18,145.4 (M)



            Asset Class
        
Equity



            Inception Date
        

01/14/1987



            Dividend Frequency
        
Quarterly





            As of
        07/20/2017



            NAV
        
 $57.46








            Factsheet
        




Favorite


                    [favorite]
                
















FCGAX
(Advisor)


Franklin Growth Fund







            Total Net Assets
        

            As of
        06/30/2017

$13,410.0 (M)



            Asset Class
        
Equity



            Inception Date
        

03/31/1948



            Dividend Frequency
        
Annually





            As of
        07/20/2017



            NAV
        
 $89.75








            Factsheet
        




Favorite


                    [favorite]
                
















FCAVX
(Advisor)


Franklin California Tax-Free Income Fund







            Total Net Assets
        

            As of
        06/30/2017

$15,778.5 (M)



            Asset Class
        
Fixed Income



            Inception Date
        

02/01/1977



            Dividend Frequency
        
Monthly





            As of
        07/20/2017



            NAV
        
 $7.47








            Factsheet
        




Favorite


                    [favorite]
                
















TTRZX
(Advisor)


Templeton Global Total Return Fund







            Total Net Assets
        

            As of
        06/30/2017

$5,640.6 (M)



            Asset Class
        
Fixed Income



            Inception Date
        

09/30/2008



            Dividend Frequency
        
Monthly





            As of
        07/20/2017



            NAV
        
 $12.41








            Factsheet
        




Favorite


                    [favorite]
                
















TFFAX
(Advisor)


Templeton Foreign Fund







            Total Net Assets
        

            As of
        06/30/2017

$7,351.7 (M)



            Asset Class
        
Equity



            Inception Date
        

10/05/1982



            Dividend Frequency
        
Annually





            As of
        07/20/2017



            NAV
        
 $7.84








            Factsheet
        




Favorite


                    [favorite]
                












View More Featured Funds













Top Resources








Forms & Applications

Open an Account Online
Account Application
Account Options Form
IRA Application
Beneficiary Distribution Request Form
Shareholder Request Form



Resources:

529 College Plans
Spryng™ – 529 Gifting Platform
Charitable Giving
Account Support
Proxy Voting
Policies









 Need Help Finding Something?


Visit our 'How do I?' section for more information about navigating the site.
Learn More






Latest Updates





Previous



Biotech: Regulation, Innovation and Opportunity
Read More


Navigating Today’s Geopolitical Landscape: French Elections
Learn More


Introducing 3 New U.S. Equity ETFs
Learn More


Commodities Overview 1Q 2017
Read More


Can a Bond Fund Rise When Rates Do?
See Our Results


Franklin Templeton’s Top Mutual Funds in 2016
See the List


Investor Stories
Read More


Franklin Rising Dividends Fund
Learn More




Next






FINRA’s BrokerCheck
You can check the background of your investment professional on FINRA’s BrokerCheck.
Learn more from FINRA about How to Find and Work with an Investment Professional.
 





Important Legal Information
All investments involve risks, including possible loss of principal.
For more information on any funds, contact your financial advisor or download prospectus. Investors should carefully consider a fund’s investment goals, risks, sales charges and expenses before investing. The prospectus contains this and other information. Please read the prospectus carefully before investing or sending money.
Past performance does not guarantee future results.
Advisor Class and Class Z shares are only offered to certain eligible investors as stated in the prospectus. They are offered without sales charges or Rule 12b-1 fees. The Fund offers multiple share classes, which are subject to different fees and expenses that will affect their performance.

This site is for U.S. residents only, and using it means you agree to our Public Site Terms of Use, Privacy Policy
In general, this site supports the current and prior major release of the following browsers: Microsoft Internet Explorer®, Mozilla Firefox®, Safari™ and Chrome.
Access to our website or your accounts may be delayed during periods of unusual market activity.
CFA® and Chartered Financial Analyst® are trademarks owned by CFA Institute.




You need Adobe Acrobat Reader 6.0 or higher to view and print PDF documents. Download a free version from Adobe's website.




Footnotes

Includes all share classes available for the fund
For performance reporting purposes, the inception date for Classes A, R, R6, Z, and Advisor Class shares of all Franklin Templeton Funds is the date of effectiveness of the fund's registration statement or the first day the fund commenced operations. For Class C shares, generally the inception date is the first day the fund commenced offering such shares. Exceptions: Templeton Global Balanced Fund Classes A and C use the inception date of the old Class A and C shares, renamed Class A1 and Class C1. For Mutual Series Funds, Franklin International Small Cap Growth Fund, Franklin Large Cap Equity Fund and Franklin Pelagos Commodities Strategy Fund, the inception date for Classes A, C, R and R6 shares is the funds' oldest class', Z or Advisor, inception date. Franklin U.S. Government Money Fund Class R6 inception date is the first day it commenced offering such shares. For Franklin Ultra-Short California Tax-Free Income Fund Classes A1 and Advisor Class use the inception date of its predecessor, Franklin California Tax-Exempt Money Fund.
The amount per share you would receive if you sold shares that day.








You need Adobe Acrobat Reader to view and print PDF documents. Download a free version from Adobe's website.
Franklin Templeton Distributors, Inc.





This website is for US residents.



View as:
Individual Investor

Financial Advisor


RIA






Open new website:
Other site:


Institutional Investor







Products & Planning



Mutual Funds


Products


Fund Resources


Investment Goals





Insights



Our Outlooks


2017 Global Investment Outlook - June Update


Global Macro Shifts


Active Views


Our Blogs





Resources



Literature


Investor Tools





Our Approach



Investment Expertise


Our Firm


Careers





Accounts



Tax Center


Account Support Help


Forms & Applications











Help


Site Usage and Accessibility


Privacy Policy


Terms of Use


Anti-Corruption Policy



Copyright © 2017 Franklin Templeton Investments. All Rights Reserved.





Connect with us:

Facebook




LinkedIn



YouTube



Twitter







Top







Close 




                                    You have  in your cart







View cart to edit items, select amounts and checkout





CONTINUE BROWSING



View Cart











CLOSE 



Mandatory Items will be removed


 is associated with the following mandatory items in your cart.



Uncheck any items you wish to keep in your cart





CANCEL



REMOVE ALL CHECKED ITEMS











Alert! You are about to be signed out.


There are literature items in your cart. If you sign out, all items will be removed.

Click "Stay Signed In" to continue your session and keep items in your cart.
Otherwise, click Sign out to end your session and empty your cart.





                                               Sign Out
                                     


Stay Signed In













You can compare a maximum of 4 funds.
Money funds and liquidated funds cannot be added to comparison.





CANCEL














 CLOSE X



















Quarterly commentary discussing fund performance.
View more details







Facebook




Twitter




LinkedIn




Email












Client Use:


(FINRA Letter)



Literature Code:



Format:

 ()


Publication Date:



Next Update:

















Download
Download Unavailable





Add to Cart
Hardcopy Unavailable





 View Cart
                                                        












 





Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft









 






Templeton Mark Found! | Check For Arrests, Warrants 










































 


 





 Templeton Mark Found!!  Check For Arrests, Warrants 
    Show Me Templeton's Records 





 Please take into consideration that Templeton Mark's records can only be used for personal reasons. For example locating old friends and family or verifying if a person has criminal history and if they can be trusted, to name a few.

You cannot use these records for consumer credit, tenant screening, employment, insurance qualifications or anything else that may be subjected to the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 USC 1681 et seq.
Templeton Mark's records do not contain credit scores and reports. We and our partners are not a consumer reporting agency.
Click here to continue.
 





 Discover Everything You Ever Wanted to Know About Templeton Mark 


 

Arrest Records, Warrants, DWI and MugshotsIf Templeton’s ever had a run-in with the law then his records will show where, when and why.


Addresses, Phone and EmailTempleton’s record will show current and past mailing addresses, phone numbers and any email addresses he’s had.


Marriage, Divorce and Birth RecordsImportant events from Templeton’s life have been compiled from state and local county.

  

Sex Offender RegistryFind out instantly if Templeton is registered as a sex offender and if he is a threat.


Hidden Online ProfilesFind out all of Templeton’s online social media profiles and any hidden ones you’re not supposed to know about.


Assets, Businesses and LicensesFind out if Templeton is hiding any assets, owns any businesses and what licenses they are registered for.

  Show Me Templeton's Records 


 Instant Access Anywhere and Anytime 


 

100% Anonymous and Instant
In a few minutes from now you'll get full access to Templeton's background in the comforts of home.
Templeton will not know you are looking up their background and pulling records.
With state of the art connection your search is also secure from prying eyes.


 


 Look Up Anyone You Want 



 Get Templeton's Records + Unlimited Searches
In addition to getting a full background on Templeton Mark, which includes contact info, arrest records, assets, bankruptcies and more, you'll also get full access to our database 24/7.
Look up anyone else you want so long as they reside in the United States of America.
Whether it's celebrities, family members or friends you're not restricted on your search.
  Get Me Templeton's Records and Unlimited Searches on Anyone I Want 
     




Copyright 2016 - 911arrests.com - All Rights Reserved 






























Mark B. Templeton - Wikipedia





















 






Mark B. Templeton

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






The neutrality of this article is disputed. Relevant discussion may be found on the talk page. Please do not remove this message until conditions to do so are met. (April 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Mark B. Templeton was President and CEO of Citrix Systems, Inc from 2001 to 2015.[1] He attended North Carolina State University, where he joined Lambda Chi Alpha Fraternity. He has an MBA from Darden Graduate School of Business Administration.
Templeton joined Citrix in 1995 as vice president of marketing, prior to the company’s initial public offering. He was appointed president in 1998 and chief executive officer in 2001. Under his leadership, Citrix transformed from a $15 million organization with one product, one customer segment and one go-to-market path, to a global powerhouse with annual revenues of $3.28 billion in 2015. Today, Citrix solutions and products enable mobile workstyles for millions of people every day. Citrix services more than 260,000 organizations with over 10,000 business partners in 100 countries.
Templeton holds a bachelor's degree in product design from North Carolina State University and an MBA from the University of Virginia, Darden School of Business. He is a passionate participant in many community and charitable organizations and serves on the board of directors of Equifax.
A popular and provocative speaker, Templeton has shared his perspective and technology vision with audiences at events such as CIO 100 and Interop, as well as the Citrix Synergy user and Citrix Summit partner conferences. He has received numerous leadership awards, such as the AeA Abacus Award for Outstanding High-Tech Executive, “Businessperson of the Year” (EVIE Award) and the Excalibur Award. He is also included on Glassdoor’s 2013 list of “50 Highest Rated CEOs.”
In his visit to Citrix SaaS division offices in February 2014, Templeton declared his highest aspiration was to be a moral corporate leader, and he received a standing ovation. Two weeks later the branch cut its workforce by 10%, something Templeton neglected to announce as the employees applauded his virtue.[2]
Templeton contributed the maximum allowed by law to Jeb Bush's 2016 Presidential Campaign. In the past he has contributed to the Republican National Committee, John McCain, Hillary Clinton, Tim Mahoney, and Ron Klein.[3][4][5][6][7][8] Templeton owns Tesla Roadster Founder's 016, Tesla Model S Founder's 020 and Tesla Model X Founder's 003. [9][10]
References[edit]



^ "Citrix Appoints Board Member Robert Calderoni as Interim President and CEO". 
^ Hoffrman, Lyz. "Citrix laying off 65 employees". SB Independent.  March 12, 2014
^ "Search Campaign Finance Data by Individual Contributor". www.fec.gov. Retrieved 2015-10-24. 
^ "FEC FORM 3X - Transaction ID 2010M04L11AI20399" (PDF). FEC Itemized Receipts Disclosures. United States Federal Election Commission. 2010-03-25. Retrieved 2015-10-23. 
^ "FEC - Schedule A-P Itemized Receipts 201510159003081219". FEC. United States Federal Election Commission. Retrieved 2015-10-23. 
^ "FEC Disclosure Report Search Results". docquery.fec.gov. Retrieved 2015-10-24. 
^ "PAGE BY PAGE REPORT DISPLAY FOR 26020910001 (Page 340 of 3609)". docquery.fec.gov. Retrieved 2015-10-24. 
^ "Donor Lookup: Find Individual and Soft Money Contributors | OpenSecrets". www.opensecrets.org. Retrieved 2015-10-24. 
^ "TMC forum post selling Tesla Roadster Founder's 00016". 
^ "EV and More blog on Tesla Model X impressions". 



External links[edit]

Company page







v
t
e


Citrix Systems



Subsidiaries



Ardence
Citrix Online
Net6
RightSignature
ShareFile
Zenprise





Products



Apache CloudStack
Citrix WinFrame
Cloud.com
GoToMeeting
GoToAssist
GoToMyPC
Podio
Xen
XenClient





People



Ed Iacobucci
Mark B. Templeton










This article about a chief executive from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.


v
t
e









 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Mark_B._Templeton&oldid=784032238"					
Categories: American computer businesspeopleAmerican technology chief executivesBusinesspeople in softwareLiving peopleNorth Carolina State University alumniUniversity of Virginia Darden School of Business alumniAmerican chief executive stubsHidden categories: NPOV disputes from April 2017All NPOV disputesAll stub articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 6 June 2017, at 02:36.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 









Mark B. Templeton - Wikipedia





















 






Mark B. Templeton

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






The neutrality of this article is disputed. Relevant discussion may be found on the talk page. Please do not remove this message until conditions to do so are met. (April 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Mark B. Templeton was President and CEO of Citrix Systems, Inc from 2001 to 2015.[1] He attended North Carolina State University, where he joined Lambda Chi Alpha Fraternity. He has an MBA from Darden Graduate School of Business Administration.
Templeton joined Citrix in 1995 as vice president of marketing, prior to the company’s initial public offering. He was appointed president in 1998 and chief executive officer in 2001. Under his leadership, Citrix transformed from a $15 million organization with one product, one customer segment and one go-to-market path, to a global powerhouse with annual revenues of $3.28 billion in 2015. Today, Citrix solutions and products enable mobile workstyles for millions of people every day. Citrix services more than 260,000 organizations with over 10,000 business partners in 100 countries.
Templeton holds a bachelor's degree in product design from North Carolina State University and an MBA from the University of Virginia, Darden School of Business. He is a passionate participant in many community and charitable organizations and serves on the board of directors of Equifax.
A popular and provocative speaker, Templeton has shared his perspective and technology vision with audiences at events such as CIO 100 and Interop, as well as the Citrix Synergy user and Citrix Summit partner conferences. He has received numerous leadership awards, such as the AeA Abacus Award for Outstanding High-Tech Executive, “Businessperson of the Year” (EVIE Award) and the Excalibur Award. He is also included on Glassdoor’s 2013 list of “50 Highest Rated CEOs.”
In his visit to Citrix SaaS division offices in February 2014, Templeton declared his highest aspiration was to be a moral corporate leader, and he received a standing ovation. Two weeks later the branch cut its workforce by 10%, something Templeton neglected to announce as the employees applauded his virtue.[2]
Templeton contributed the maximum allowed by law to Jeb Bush's 2016 Presidential Campaign. In the past he has contributed to the Republican National Committee, John McCain, Hillary Clinton, Tim Mahoney, and Ron Klein.[3][4][5][6][7][8] Templeton owns Tesla Roadster Founder's 016, Tesla Model S Founder's 020 and Tesla Model X Founder's 003. [9][10]
References[edit]



^ "Citrix Appoints Board Member Robert Calderoni as Interim President and CEO". 
^ Hoffrman, Lyz. "Citrix laying off 65 employees". SB Independent.  March 12, 2014
^ "Search Campaign Finance Data by Individual Contributor". www.fec.gov. Retrieved 2015-10-24. 
^ "FEC FORM 3X - Transaction ID 2010M04L11AI20399" (PDF). FEC Itemized Receipts Disclosures. United States Federal Election Commission. 2010-03-25. Retrieved 2015-10-23. 
^ "FEC - Schedule A-P Itemized Receipts 201510159003081219". FEC. United States Federal Election Commission. Retrieved 2015-10-23. 
^ "FEC Disclosure Report Search Results". docquery.fec.gov. Retrieved 2015-10-24. 
^ "PAGE BY PAGE REPORT DISPLAY FOR 26020910001 (Page 340 of 3609)". docquery.fec.gov. Retrieved 2015-10-24. 
^ "Donor Lookup: Find Individual and Soft Money Contributors | OpenSecrets". www.opensecrets.org. Retrieved 2015-10-24. 
^ "TMC forum post selling Tesla Roadster Founder's 00016". 
^ "EV and More blog on Tesla Model X impressions". 



External links[edit]

Company page







v
t
e


Citrix Systems



Subsidiaries



Ardence
Citrix Online
Net6
RightSignature
ShareFile
Zenprise





Products



Apache CloudStack
Citrix WinFrame
Cloud.com
GoToMeeting
GoToAssist
GoToMyPC
Podio
Xen
XenClient





People



Ed Iacobucci
Mark B. Templeton










This article about a chief executive from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.


v
t
e









 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Mark_B._Templeton&oldid=784032238"					
Categories: American computer businesspeopleAmerican technology chief executivesBusinesspeople in softwareLiving peopleNorth Carolina State University alumniUniversity of Virginia Darden School of Business alumniAmerican chief executive stubsHidden categories: NPOV disputes from April 2017All NPOV disputesAll stub articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 6 June 2017, at 02:36.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 










Creative Commons — Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported
— CC BY-SA 3.0 






















Skip to content








 Menu















Help us build a vibrant, collaborative global commons
Donate Now














Creative Commons


Creative Commons License Deed







Attribution-ShareAlike 3.0 Unported

(CC BY-SA 3.0)








This is a human-readable summary of (and not a substitute for) the license.


Disclaimer.






You are free to:


Share — copy and redistribute the material in any medium or format


Adapt — remix, transform, and build upon the material


for any purpose, even commercially.

















The licensor cannot revoke these freedoms as long as you follow the license terms.




Under the following terms:



Attribution — You must give appropriate credit, provide a link to the license, and indicate if changes were made. You may do so in any reasonable manner, but not in any way that suggests the licensor endorses you or your use.




Attribute this work:












ShareAlike — If you remix, transform, or build upon the material, you must distribute your contributions under the same license as the original.








No additional restrictions — You may not apply legal terms or technological measures that legally restrict others from doing anything the license permits.






Notices:



You do not have to comply with the license for elements of the material in the public domain or where your use is permitted by an applicable exception or limitation.


No warranties are given. The license may not give you all of the permissions necessary for your intended use. For example, other rights such as publicity, privacy, or moral rights may limit how you use the material.








Learn more about CC licensing, or use the license for your own material.






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
Make a Donation






This page is available in the following languages:


Castellano
Castellano (España)
Català
Dansk
Deutsch
English
Esperanto
français
Galego
hrvatski
Indonesia
Italiano
Latviski
Lietuvių
Melayu
Nederlands
Norsk
polski
Português
Português (BR)
română
Slovenščina
Suomeksi
svenska
Türkçe
íslenska
česky
Ελληνικά
Беларуская
русский
українська
العربية
پارسی
中文
日本語
華語 (台灣)
한국어






This content is freely available under simple legal terms because of Creative Commons, a non-profit that survives on donations. If you love this content, and love that it's free for everyone, please consider a donation to support our work.
When you share, everyone wins.





Contribute today to Creative Commons




$100



$50



$25



$5































Disclaimer

This deed highlights only some of the key features and terms of the actual license. It is not a license and has no legal value. You should carefully review all of the terms and conditions of the actual license before using the licensed material.
Creative Commons is not a law firm and does not provide legal services. Distributing, displaying, or linking to this deed or the license that it summarizes does not create a lawyer-client or any other relationship.




What does "Attribute this work" mean?


The page you came from contained embedded licensing metadata, including how the creator wishes to be attributed for re-use. You can use the HTML here to cite the work. Doing so will also include metadata on your page so that others can find the original work as well.




The applicable mediation rules will be designated in the copyright notice published with the work, or if none then in the request for mediation. Unless otherwise designated in a copyright notice attached to the work, the UNCITRAL Arbitration Rules apply to any arbitration.
More info.




If supplied, you must provide the name of the creator and attribution parties, a copyright notice, a license notice, a disclaimer notice, and a link to the material. CC licenses prior to Version 4.0 also require you to provide the title of the material if supplied, and may have other slight differences.
More info.




In 4.0, you must indicate if you modified the material and retain an indication of previous modifications. In 3.0 and earlier license versions, the indication of changes is only required if you create a derivative.
Marking guide.
More info.




You may also use a license listed as compatible at https://creativecommons.org/compatiblelicenses
More info.




A commercial use is one primarily intended for commercial advantage or monetary compensation.
More info.




Merely changing the format never creates a derivative.
More info.




The license prohibits application of effective technological measures, defined with reference to Article 11 of the WIPO Copyright Treaty.
More info.




The rights of users under exceptions and limitations, such as fair use and fair dealing, are not affected by the CC licenses.
More info.




You may need to get additional permissions before using the material as you intend.
More info.























Mark B. Templeton - Wikipedia





















 






Mark B. Templeton

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






The neutrality of this article is disputed. Relevant discussion may be found on the talk page. Please do not remove this message until conditions to do so are met. (April 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Mark B. Templeton was President and CEO of Citrix Systems, Inc from 2001 to 2015.[1] He attended North Carolina State University, where he joined Lambda Chi Alpha Fraternity. He has an MBA from Darden Graduate School of Business Administration.
Templeton joined Citrix in 1995 as vice president of marketing, prior to the company’s initial public offering. He was appointed president in 1998 and chief executive officer in 2001. Under his leadership, Citrix transformed from a $15 million organization with one product, one customer segment and one go-to-market path, to a global powerhouse with annual revenues of $3.28 billion in 2015. Today, Citrix solutions and products enable mobile workstyles for millions of people every day. Citrix services more than 260,000 organizations with over 10,000 business partners in 100 countries.
Templeton holds a bachelor's degree in product design from North Carolina State University and an MBA from the University of Virginia, Darden School of Business. He is a passionate participant in many community and charitable organizations and serves on the board of directors of Equifax.
A popular and provocative speaker, Templeton has shared his perspective and technology vision with audiences at events such as CIO 100 and Interop, as well as the Citrix Synergy user and Citrix Summit partner conferences. He has received numerous leadership awards, such as the AeA Abacus Award for Outstanding High-Tech Executive, “Businessperson of the Year” (EVIE Award) and the Excalibur Award. He is also included on Glassdoor’s 2013 list of “50 Highest Rated CEOs.”
In his visit to Citrix SaaS division offices in February 2014, Templeton declared his highest aspiration was to be a moral corporate leader, and he received a standing ovation. Two weeks later the branch cut its workforce by 10%, something Templeton neglected to announce as the employees applauded his virtue.[2]
Templeton contributed the maximum allowed by law to Jeb Bush's 2016 Presidential Campaign. In the past he has contributed to the Republican National Committee, John McCain, Hillary Clinton, Tim Mahoney, and Ron Klein.[3][4][5][6][7][8] Templeton owns Tesla Roadster Founder's 016, Tesla Model S Founder's 020 and Tesla Model X Founder's 003. [9][10]
References[edit]



^ "Citrix Appoints Board Member Robert Calderoni as Interim President and CEO". 
^ Hoffrman, Lyz. "Citrix laying off 65 employees". SB Independent.  March 12, 2014
^ "Search Campaign Finance Data by Individual Contributor". www.fec.gov. Retrieved 2015-10-24. 
^ "FEC FORM 3X - Transaction ID 2010M04L11AI20399" (PDF). FEC Itemized Receipts Disclosures. United States Federal Election Commission. 2010-03-25. Retrieved 2015-10-23. 
^ "FEC - Schedule A-P Itemized Receipts 201510159003081219". FEC. United States Federal Election Commission. Retrieved 2015-10-23. 
^ "FEC Disclosure Report Search Results". docquery.fec.gov. Retrieved 2015-10-24. 
^ "PAGE BY PAGE REPORT DISPLAY FOR 26020910001 (Page 340 of 3609)". docquery.fec.gov. Retrieved 2015-10-24. 
^ "Donor Lookup: Find Individual and Soft Money Contributors | OpenSecrets". www.opensecrets.org. Retrieved 2015-10-24. 
^ "TMC forum post selling Tesla Roadster Founder's 00016". 
^ "EV and More blog on Tesla Model X impressions". 



External links[edit]

Company page







v
t
e


Citrix Systems



Subsidiaries



Ardence
Citrix Online
Net6
RightSignature
ShareFile
Zenprise





Products



Apache CloudStack
Citrix WinFrame
Cloud.com
GoToMeeting
GoToAssist
GoToMyPC
Podio
Xen
XenClient





People



Ed Iacobucci
Mark B. Templeton










This article about a chief executive from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.


v
t
e









 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Mark_B._Templeton&oldid=784032238"					
Categories: American computer businesspeopleAmerican technology chief executivesBusinesspeople in softwareLiving peopleNorth Carolina State University alumniUniversity of Virginia Darden School of Business alumniAmerican chief executive stubsHidden categories: NPOV disputes from April 2017All NPOV disputesAll stub articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 6 June 2017, at 02:36.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 











Mark B. Templeton - Wikipedia





















 






Mark B. Templeton

From Wikipedia, the free encyclopedia


					Jump to:					navigation, 					search






The neutrality of this article is disputed. Relevant discussion may be found on the talk page. Please do not remove this message until conditions to do so are met. (April 2017) (Learn how and when to remove this template message)


Mark B. Templeton was President and CEO of Citrix Systems, Inc from 2001 to 2015.[1] He attended North Carolina State University, where he joined Lambda Chi Alpha Fraternity. He has an MBA from Darden Graduate School of Business Administration.
Templeton joined Citrix in 1995 as vice president of marketing, prior to the company’s initial public offering. He was appointed president in 1998 and chief executive officer in 2001. Under his leadership, Citrix transformed from a $15 million organization with one product, one customer segment and one go-to-market path, to a global powerhouse with annual revenues of $3.28 billion in 2015. Today, Citrix solutions and products enable mobile workstyles for millions of people every day. Citrix services more than 260,000 organizations with over 10,000 business partners in 100 countries.
Templeton holds a bachelor's degree in product design from North Carolina State University and an MBA from the University of Virginia, Darden School of Business. He is a passionate participant in many community and charitable organizations and serves on the board of directors of Equifax.
A popular and provocative speaker, Templeton has shared his perspective and technology vision with audiences at events such as CIO 100 and Interop, as well as the Citrix Synergy user and Citrix Summit partner conferences. He has received numerous leadership awards, such as the AeA Abacus Award for Outstanding High-Tech Executive, “Businessperson of the Year” (EVIE Award) and the Excalibur Award. He is also included on Glassdoor’s 2013 list of “50 Highest Rated CEOs.”
In his visit to Citrix SaaS division offices in February 2014, Templeton declared his highest aspiration was to be a moral corporate leader, and he received a standing ovation. Two weeks later the branch cut its workforce by 10%, something Templeton neglected to announce as the employees applauded his virtue.[2]
Templeton contributed the maximum allowed by law to Jeb Bush's 2016 Presidential Campaign. In the past he has contributed to the Republican National Committee, John McCain, Hillary Clinton, Tim Mahoney, and Ron Klein.[3][4][5][6][7][8] Templeton owns Tesla Roadster Founder's 016, Tesla Model S Founder's 020 and Tesla Model X Founder's 003. [9][10]
References[edit]



^ "Citrix Appoints Board Member Robert Calderoni as Interim President and CEO". 
^ Hoffrman, Lyz. "Citrix laying off 65 employees". SB Independent.  March 12, 2014
^ "Search Campaign Finance Data by Individual Contributor". www.fec.gov. Retrieved 2015-10-24. 
^ "FEC FORM 3X - Transaction ID 2010M04L11AI20399" (PDF). FEC Itemized Receipts Disclosures. United States Federal Election Commission. 2010-03-25. Retrieved 2015-10-23. 
^ "FEC - Schedule A-P Itemized Receipts 201510159003081219". FEC. United States Federal Election Commission. Retrieved 2015-10-23. 
^ "FEC Disclosure Report Search Results". docquery.fec.gov. Retrieved 2015-10-24. 
^ "PAGE BY PAGE REPORT DISPLAY FOR 26020910001 (Page 340 of 3609)". docquery.fec.gov. Retrieved 2015-10-24. 
^ "Donor Lookup: Find Individual and Soft Money Contributors | OpenSecrets". www.opensecrets.org. Retrieved 2015-10-24. 
^ "TMC forum post selling Tesla Roadster Founder's 00016". 
^ "EV and More blog on Tesla Model X impressions". 



External links[edit]

Company page







v
t
e


Citrix Systems



Subsidiaries



Ardence
Citrix Online
Net6
RightSignature
ShareFile
Zenprise





Products



Apache CloudStack
Citrix WinFrame
Cloud.com
GoToMeeting
GoToAssist
GoToMyPC
Podio
Xen
XenClient





People



Ed Iacobucci
Mark B. Templeton










This article about a chief executive from the United States is a stub. You can help Wikipedia by expanding it.


v
t
e









 
						Retrieved from "https://en.wikipedia.org/w/index.php?title=Mark_B._Templeton&oldid=784032238"					
Categories: American computer businesspeopleAmerican technology chief executivesBusinesspeople in softwareLiving peopleNorth Carolina State University alumniUniversity of Virginia Darden School of Business alumniAmerican chief executive stubsHidden categories: NPOV disputes from April 2017All NPOV disputesAll stub articles 



Navigation menu


Personal tools

Not logged inTalkContributionsCreate accountLog in 



Namespaces

Article
Talk




Variants









Views

Read
Edit
View history



More







Search



 







Navigation


Main pageContentsFeatured contentCurrent eventsRandom articleDonate to WikipediaWikipedia store 



Interaction


HelpAbout WikipediaCommunity portalRecent changesContact page 



Tools


What links hereRelated changesUpload fileSpecial pagesPermanent linkPage informationWikidata itemCite this page 



Print/export


Create a bookDownload as PDFPrintable version 



Languages



Add links 





 This page was last edited on 6 June 2017, at 02:36.
Text is available under the Creative Commons Attribution-ShareAlike License;
additional terms may apply.  By using this site, you agree to the Terms of Use and Privacy Policy. Wikipedia® is a registered trademark of the Wikimedia Foundation, Inc., a non-profit organization.


Privacy policy
About Wikipedia
Disclaimers
Contact Wikipedia
Developers
Cookie statement
Mobile view



 

 











Page not found - Fedscoop









































Subscribe
About
RSS


Brought to you by











File not found.
The page you are looking for cannot be found. Please return to the homepage.










Search for:








The best federal IT news, delivered straight to your inbox. Sign up for our daily newsletter.











Continue to FedScoop.com
































Data Dumps  |  Freebase API (Deprecated)
       |  Google Developers
    
    
      
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
      
    
    
    All Products
  
  Sign in

  
  Send feedback
  





            Hey there! Are you maybe looking for Firebase instead?

            







    Data Dumps
  


The Freebase API will be completely shut-down on Aug 31 2016. This page provides access to the last available data dump. Read more.
Data Dumps are a downloadable version of the data in Freebase. They constitute a snapshot of the data stored in Freebase and the Schema that structures it, and are provided under the same CC-BY license. The Freebase/Wikidata mappings are provided under the CC0 license.

Freebase Triples
Freebase Deleted Triples
Freebase/Wikidata Mappings
License
Citing

Freebase Triples


This dataset contains every fact currently in Freebase.

Total triples: 1.9 billion
Updated: Weekly
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC-BY

22 GB gzip250 GB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.date> "2001-02"^^<http://www.w3.org/2001/XMLSchema#gYearMonth>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.source> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11x1gf2m6>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/type.object.type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage.rate> 4.5 .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/g.11vjz1ynm>  <http://www.w3.org/1999/02/22-rdf-syntax-ns#type> <http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/measurement_unit.dated_percentage>  .


If you're writing your own code to parse the RDF dumps its often more efficient to read directly from GZip file rather than extracting the data first and then processing the uncompressed data.
<subject>  <predicate>  <object> .
Note: In Freebase, objects have MIDs that look like /m/012rkqx. In RDF those MIDs become m.012rkqx. Likewise, Freebase schema like /common/topic are written as common.topic.
The subject is the ID of a Freebase object. It can be a Freebase MID (ex. m.012rkqx) for topics and CVTs or a human-readable ID (ex. common.topic) for schema.
The predicate is always a human-readable ID for a Freebase property or a property from a standard RDF vocabulary like RDFS. Freebase foreign key namespaces are also used as predicates to make it easier to look up keys by namespace.
The object field may contain a Freebase MID for an object or a human-readable ID for schema from Freebase or other RDF vocabularies. It may also include literal values like strings, booleans and numeric values.
Topic descriptions often contain newlines. In order to make each triple fit on one line, we have escaped newlines with "\n".
Freebase Deleted Triples
We also provide a dump of triples that have been deleted from Freebase over time. This is a one-time dump through March 2013. In the future, we might consider providing periodic updates of recently deleted triples, but at the moment we have no specific timeframe for doing so, and are only providing this one-time dump. 

The dump is distributed as a .tar.gz file (2.1Gb compressed, 7.7Gb uncompressed). It contains 63,036,271 deleted triples in 20 files (there is no particular meaning to the individual files, it is just easier to manipulate several smaller files than one huge file).


Thanks to Chun How Tan and John Giannandrea for making this data release possible.




Total triples: 63 million
Updated: June 9, 2013
Data Format: CSV
License: CC-BY

2 GB gzip8 GB uncompressed

Download



The data format is essentially CSV with one important caveat. The object field may contain any characters, including commas (as well as any other reasonable delimiters you could think of). However, all the other fields are guaranteed not to contain commas, so the data can still be parsed unambiguously.

The columns in the dataset are defined as:

creation_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
creator
deletion_timestamp (Unix epoch time in milliseconds)
deletor
subject (MID)
predicate (MID)
object (MID/Literal)
language_code



CSV
1352854086000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,1352855856000,/user/mwcl_wikipedia_en,/m/03r90,/type/object/key,/wikipedia/en/$B816,en
1355171076000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364258198000,/user/turtlewax_bot,/m/0nncp9z,/music/recording/artist,/m/01vbfm4,en
1176630380000,/user/mwcl_images,1335928144000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/029w57m,/common/image/size,/m/0kly56,en
1292854917000,/user/mwcl_musicbrainz,1364823418001,/user/mbz_pipeline_merge_bot,/m/0fv1vl8,/type/object/type,/common/topic,en
1205530905000,/user/mwcl_images,1336022041000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/01x5scz,/common/licensed_object/license,/m/02x6b,en
1302391361000,/user/content_administrator,1336190973000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/0gkb45y,/type/object/type,/type/content,en
1176728962002,/user/mwcl_images,1335954186000,/user/gardening_bot,/m/08430h,/common/topic/image,/m/02cs147,en
1172002568007,/user/mwcl_chefmoz,1283588560000,/user/delete_bot,/m/01z4c1z,/type/object/name,La Casa Rosa Mexican Restaurant,en


Freebase/Wikidata Mappings


The data has been created based on the Wikidata-Dump of October 28, 2013, and contains only those links that have at least two common Wikipedia-Links and not a single disagreeing Wikipedia-Link. Furthermore, the lines are sorted by the number of common Wikipedia-Links (although in Turtle this does not really matter).

Total triples: 2.1M
Updated: October 28, 2013
Data Format: N-Triples RDF
License: CC0

21.2 MB gzip242.9 MB uncompressed

Download



The RDF data is serialized using the N-Triples format, encoded as UTF-8 text and compressed with Gzip.


RDF
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0695j>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q6718> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.05nrg>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs7>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q538> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0jgd>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q414> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.0d_23>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q2537> .
<http://rdf.freebase.com/ns/m.04g7d>  <http://www.w3.org/2002/07/owl#sameAs>  <http://www.wikidata.org/entity/Q315> .


License
Freebase Data Dumps are provided free of charge for any purpose with regular updates by Google. They are distributed, like Freebase itself, under the Creative Commons Attribution (aka CC-BY) and use is subject to the Terms of Service.
The Freebase/Wikidata ID mappings are provided under CC0 and can be used without restrictions.
Citing
If you'd like to cite these data dumps in a publication, you may use:

Google, Freebase Data Dumps, https://developers.google.com/freebase/data, <month> <day>, <year>

Or as BibTeX:


BibTex

@misc{freebase:datadumps,
  title = "Freebase Data Dumps"
  author = "Google",
  howpublished = "\url{https://developers.google.com/freebase/data}",
  edition = "<month> <day>, <year>",
  year = "<year>"
}




Except as otherwise noted, the content of this page is licensed under the Creative Commons Attribution 3.0 License, and code samples are licensed under the Apache 2.0 License. For details, see our Site Policies. Java is a registered trademark of Oracle and/or its affiliates.

      
      Last updated February 10, 2017.
    




Send feedback about...
          
          This page
        
            
            Documentation feedback
          
        Freebase API (Deprecated)
        
            
            Product feedback
          
        
        Cancel
      
